1. This is my third Policy Address. 
2. The Third Plenary Session of the 20th Central Committee of the  Communist Party of China (CPC Central Committee) adopted the Resolution  of the CPC Central Committee on Further Deepening Reform Comprehensively  to Advance Chinese Modernization. The Resolution calls on Hong Kong to  fully harness the institutional strengths of “One Country, Two Systems” while  consolidating and enhancing its status as an international financial, shipping and  trade centre. It also supports Hong Kong’s position to become an international  hub for high‑calibre talents, to exert a greater role in our country’s opening up to  the world, and to deepen collaboration within the Guangdong‑Hong Kong‑Macao  Greater Bay Area (GBA) through better harmonisation of rules and mechanisms. 
3. In running for office, more than two years ago, I stated that “we must  embrace a reform mind‑set” and we “need further revamping”. I proposed to  build a “result‑oriented” government, setting key performance indicators (KPIs)  to create a new government culture. I put forward a series of reform measures,  including the establishment of Care Teams to enhance district services, introduction  of the Advance Allocation Scheme to shorten the waiting time for public housing,  and assistance to junior secondary students living in subdivided units (SDUs)  for tackling intergenerational poverty. I believe that we must maintain our  development momentum and self‑renewal, and that we must embrace changes  while staying principled, innovative and flexible in meeting challenges and  opportunities. 
4. Regarding system reforms, I work on the principle that anything essential  but lacking in the system must be established; any serious shortcomings must be  rectified; any bottlenecks, weaknesses or hurdles must be overcome; and any areas  in need of consolidation must be reinforced and improved. In the reform process,  we have to decide what should be built from scratch, what should be overhauled to  set things right, and what should be consolidated and bolstered. In taking forward  reforms, we must have a systemic mind‑set and manage the relationships between  overall and local interests, between the present and the future, between macro and  micro concerns. While we may make reference to the successful experiences of other places, we cannot adopt them directly given the differences in the basis and  structure of our systems. Our reform proposals must take heed of the prevailing  circumstances and be tailored to local conditions. 
5. Since becoming Chief Executive, I have carried out reforms along the  above principle. 
6. On implementation of “One Country, Two Systems”, we fulfilled the  constitutional responsibility to enact local legislation for Article 23 of the Basic Law;  we reformed the institutional set-up of the District Councils by implementing the  principle of “patriots administering Hong Kong”; we enacted a new legislation to  enable an essentially automatic extension of land leases in an orderly manner for  a term of 50 years to beyond 2047, manifesting the long‑term adherence to “One  Country, Two Systems”. 
7. On governance, we reformed the government structure and reshuffled  the duties among policy bureaux, increasing their number from 13 to 15. We  created three new Deputy Secretaries of Department to strengthen co‑ordination  of work across bureaux, setting up task forces led by the Deputy Secretaries to  enhance implementation. We cultivated a government culture focusing on results.  We also introduced a mechanism mobilising the Government at all levels to respond  to major incidents. 
8. In economic development, we established the Hong Kong Investment  Corporation Limited (HKIC) to optimise the use of government funds for  the development of industries and our economy. We pressed ahead with the  development of the “eight centres” and the Northern Metropolis, taking an  industry‑oriented approach. We set up the Hong Kong Talent Engage (HKTE) and  the Office for Attracting Strategic Enterprises (OASES) to strengthen our efforts in  trawling for talents and enterprises. We also established Hong Kong as a regional  hub for higher education. 
9. As for people’s livelihood, we implemented healthcare reform and took  steps to build our primary review mechanism for drugs and medical devices. We  set up a system for bringing in healthcare professionals to alleviate manpower  shortage in the public healthcare system. We also launched Light Public Housing  (LPH) to fill short‑term gaps in the supply of public housing, and established the  Task Force on Tackling the Issue of Subdivided Units. We pooled resources for  targeted poverty alleviation. We established an annual review mechanism for  minimum wage protection. We also rationalised traffic flow among the three road  harbour crossings.
10. Reform is a continuous process. Over the past two years, my team and  I have focused on economic growth and on improving people’s livelihood through  development, with the well‑being of the people of Hong Kong close to our hearts.  This Policy Address will deepen our reforms and explore new growth areas.  Measures include building an international gold trading market, promoting high  value‑added maritime services, and building a commodity trading ecosystem and  internationally‑accredited metal warehouses. We will promulgate the Development  Outline for the Hong Kong‑Shenzhen Innovation and Technology Park in the Loop,  building a testing ground for policy and institutional innovation. We will also set  up a working group on developing the low‑altitude economy. 
11. In this Policy Address, I will continue to follow through the “four  proposals” put forward by President Xi Jinping in his important speech delivered  on 1 July 2022. I will also outline our vision and objectives for reforms and changes,  as well as the related key measures and KPIs. A Supplement offering more details  on the policy measures and related matters has also been compiled. 
II. Steadfastly and Successfully Implement  “One Country, Two Systems” and  
Strengthening Our Governance Systems 
(A) Fully and Faithfully Implement the Principle of  “One Country, Two Systems” 
Optimise the Institutional Strengths of “One Country, Two Systems” 12. The institutional advantages of “One Country, Two Systems” are  numerous. Whether Hong Kong was fighting against the pandemic, tackling  economic challenges, or seeking development opportunities, the Central  Government always stands by Hong Kong and supports Hong Kong through a  multitude of facilitation measures, ensuring our long‑term prosperity and stability. 13. Under the principle of “One Country, Two Systems”, Hong Kong is  rooted in “One Country” and enjoys the benefits of “Two Systems”, enabling  Hong Kong to serve the country’s needs with its own strengths. Hong Kong  boasts both national and international advantages, enjoying the benefits of policies,  guarantees and opportunities of our country. Hong Kong is an international city  fully open to the world, underpinned by a capitalist system, with free flow of  capital, people and information. It adopts a common law system, maintains its own  legislative and judicial systems, laws, tax regime, currency and financial system,  and is a separate customs territory. Hong Kong is a global metropolis. 14. We will continue to fully, faithfully and resolutely implement the  principles of “One Country, Two Systems”, “Hong Kong people administering  Hong Kong” and a high degree of autonomy. We will continue to fully leverage the  institutional strengths of “One Country, Two Systems” for sustaining the prosperity  and stability of Hong Kong, contributing to China’s building into a great country  and realising the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation. 
Safeguard National Security 
15. Security and development work together like the two wings of a bird.  Development requires a safe social environment. In March 2024, the Hong Kong  Special Administrative Region (HKSAR) fulfilled the constitutional responsibility  and historic mission of enacting local legislation for Article 23 of the Basic Law.  The newly enacted Safeguarding National Security Ordinance (SNSO) achieves  convergence, compatibility and complementarity with the Hong Kong National 
Security Law (HKNSL). Together they form a comprehensive legal system and  enforcement mechanism for safeguarding national security. But threats to national  security may spring up any time. We must stay vigilant and put up our guard. 16. Public officers are duty bound to safeguard national security. Section 8(3) (a) of the SNSO stipulates that if the law of the HKSAR confers any function on any  person, the function is to be read as including a duty to safeguard national security.  Section 114 stipulates that public servants must provide assistance for the work on  safeguarding national security. All bureaux and departments must review their  codes, guidelines and procedures to ensure compliance with these provisions. 17. It is of utmost importance that our people safeguard national security  of their own accord. Since opening in August, the National Security Exhibition  Gallery has been well‑received by the public. We will train up tutors at district  level for promotion of national security education in the community. Thematic  exhibitions will be rolled out by the gallery to dovetail with the 10th National  Security Education Day next year. The Education Bureau (EDB) will also update  the Curriculum Framework of National Security Education. 
Foster Patriotic Education 
18. The Working Group on Patriotic Education has formulated promotion  strategies and measures for supporting the organisation of more activities such  that the spirit of patriotism can take root in society. Next year marks the 80th  anniversary of victory in the War of Resistance. The Government will host  commemorative activities to strengthen the sense of patriotism. The EDB will  organise a range of joint school and cross‑sectoral activities under the “Love Our  Home, Treasure Our Country 3.0” series, continue to enhance Chinese History  and national geography education in primary and secondary schools, and enrich  patriotism and history elements in Mainland exchange programmes. 
Promote Chinese Culture 
19. Established in April, the Chinese Culture Promotion Office earnestly  promotes Chinese culture, including planning for the construction of a museum to  showcase the development and achievements of our country, and a new Chinese  Culture Experience Centre. It also continues to organise the Chinese Culture  Festival and exhibitions of the General History of China series.
(B) Strengthen Our Governance Systems 
20. Since taking office, the current‑term Government has taken forward  various reforms on cross‑disciplinary co‑ordination and governance culture so  as to strengthen our governance systems. Apart from introducing three Deputy  Secretaries of Department to strengthen leadership and cross‑bureau co‑ordination,  I have set indicators for specified tasks and monitored their progress and  outcomes, creating a government culture focusing on actions and delivery of  results. Moreover, we have updated the Civil Service Code to spell out the core  values and standards of conduct that civil servants should uphold, and introduced  a mechanism to mobilise the Government at all levels to enhance emergency  response. The Government will deepen the reforms and continue to strengthen our  governance systems. 
Enhance the Cross-bureau Co-ordination Mechanism 
21. We will enhance the leadership and cross‑bureau co‑ordination  mechanisms, and fully leverage the leading and co‑ordinating functions of  Secretaries and Deputy Secretaries of Department. We will establish the following  committee and working groups: 
(i) The Committee on Education, Technology and Talents, chaired by the  Chief Secretary for Administration with the Secretary for Education,  Secretary for Innovation, Technology and Industry, and Secretary  for Labour and Welfare, as members, will co‑ordinate and promote  the integrated development of education, technology and talents.  It will also expand connections, attract and cultivate talents, foster  the development of technologies, and promote Hong Kong as an  international hub for high‑calibre talents; 
(ii) The Working Group on Developing Low‑altitude Economy, led by the  Deputy Financial Secretary, will kick‑start projects with application  prospects, formulate development strategies and action plans on the  low‑altitude economy, as well as take forward regulatory reform and  plans for related infrastructural facilities; 
(iii) The Working Group on Developing Tourist Hotspots, led by  the Deputy Chief Secretary for Administration, will strengthen  cross‑departmental co‑ordination and leverage community efforts,  identifying and developing tourist hotspots of high popularity and  with strong appeal in various districts; and
(iv) The Working Group on Promoting Silver Economy, led by the Deputy  Chief Secretary for Administration, will formulate measures to  expedite the development of the silver industry in line with the daily  needs of the elderly. 
Strengthen Governance Capabilities of the Civil Service 
Strengthen Civil Service Management 
22. Efforts in strengthening the reward and punishment system in the  past two years include launching the Chief Executive’s Award for Exemplary  Performance, streamlining the mechanism of directing officers with persistent  sub‑standard performance to retire, improving the efficiency and effectiveness of  handling disciplinary cases. We will review the Public Service (Administration)  Order and Public Service (Disciplinary) Regulation to enhance the civil service  disciplinary mechanism, and will consult with the Public Service Commission on  the preliminary proposals next year. 
National Studies and International Training 
23. The civil service must have a full grasp of the policy objectives and  strategies of our nation. The Government will organise seminars and learning  activities on the important policies, reports and so on delivered by the Central  People’s Government (CPG). We will also arrange for the middle, senior and  directorate level officers to receive training at renowned institutions in the Mainland  and overseas to help foster their sense of national identity and develop global  perspectives. 
24. With the support of the CPG, the HKSAR Government will continue to  send officers to work in various offices of the United Nations through a dedicated  programme. 
Civil Service Exchange Programme between Hong Kong and the Mainland 25. The Government will collaborate with the Mainland cities in the GBA, as  well as Beijing, Shanghai, Chongqing, Wuhan and Hangzhou to launch mutual civil  service exchange programmes. 
Launch the Governance Talents Development Programme 26. The Civil Service College will launch a Governance Talents Development  Programme to further develop governance capabilities of officers at leadership  ranks. The college will also enhance its internal research and training capability  building.
Digital Transformation of Public Services 
27. The Digital Policy Office (DPO) will endeavour to fortify information  systems of the Government and public organisations. The DPO will also spearhead  the pilot use of a locally developed generative artificial intelligence (AI) document  processing copilot application in government departments. About 20 digital  government and smart city initiatives will also be launched this year, including  using blockchain technology for issuing electronic certificates for designated civil  service examinations and electronic licensing by the Fire Services Department, as  well as the use of AI for handling public enquiries. 
Bolster Security of Computer Systems of Critical Infrastructure 28. The Government will require critical infrastructure operators to  undertake obligations to protect their computer systems, so as to reinforce their  resilience against cybersecurity challenges. A bill will be introduced later this year
III. Consolidate and Enhance Our Status as an  International Financial, Shipping and Trade  Centre 
29. The development of international financial, shipping and trading  centres are closely intertwined. Besides expanding and strengthening our existing  businesses, we will also explore new growth areas, specifically by creating a  commodity trading ecosystem to attract relevant enterprises to establish presence in  Hong Kong, turning our city into an operation centre for international commodity  trading, storage and delivery, shipping and logistics, risk management, and more.  This will help develop the markets in international gold, non‑ferrous metal, green  transportation, and others, further promoting the integrated development of  Hong Kong as an international financial, shipping and trade centre. 
30. Hong Kong ranks among the world’s largest import and export markets  for gold by volume. The current complexity in geopolitics underscores our city’s  edge in security and stability, and hence an attractive location for investors for gold  storage, spurring relevant activities such as gold trading, settlement, and delivery.  We will capitalise on our strengths as an international financial centre to build  Hong Kong into an international gold trading centre. 
31. The Government will facilitate an international commodity exchange  to set up accredited warehouses in Hong Kong. We will also introduce measures  such as a preferential tax regime to attract enterprises to expand their business in  Hong Kong, and to increase storage and trade volume of commodities. 
32. Green shipping and aviation is a global trend. The Government will  nurture industrial development of sustainable aviation fuel and green maritime fuel,  and establish a fuel bunkering centre, leveraging the development opportunities in  finance, trading and maritime sectors stemming from new energy. 
(A) International Financial Centre 
33. Hong Kong is an international financial centre, ranking third globally  and first in investment environment. The Government will continue with reforms  to reinforce and enhance our status as an international financial centre.
Deepen Mutual Market Access and Enrich Offshore Renminbi  Business 
34. We will continue to enhance the mutual market access regime and  reinforce our status as the world’s largest offshore Renminbi (RMB) business hub,  contributing to the internationalisation of RMB. Key measures include continuously  improving our infrastructure and upgrading the Central Moneymarkets Unit to  facilitate the settlement of various assets in different currencies by international  investors. We will also develop the fixed income market infrastructure by,  for instance, setting up a central clearing system for RMB‑denominated bond  repurchase (repo) transactions, making RMB sovereign bonds issued in Hong Kong  a more popular choice of collateral in offshore markets. We will look to enhance the  Cross‑boundary Wealth Management Connect Scheme as well. 
35. We will also strive to bolster offshore RMB liquidity and make good use  of the currency swap agreement between the HKSAR and our country, enabling the  Hong Kong Monetary Authority (HKMA) to better support Hong Kong’s economic  and trade development; expand the night‑time, cross‑boundary service capability of  Hong Kong’s RMB Real Time Gross Settlement System to facilitate global settlement  in offshore RMB markets; and explore the provision of more diversified channels for  obtaining offshore RMB financing. 
36. We will provide more RMB‑denominated investment products – 
(i) the Hong Kong Exchanges and Clearing Limited (HKEX) to  encourage more listed companies to have shares listed in the RMB  stock trading counter, and expand the scope of RMB equities; 
(ii) to increase issuance of RMB bonds and support issuance of more  green and sustainable offshore RMB bonds in Hong Kong; 
(iii) to seek support from the Ministry of Finance for boosting the size and  frequency of issuing RMB sovereign bonds, and launching offshore  RMB sovereign bond futures as soon as possible, in Hong Kong; and 
(iv) to actively liaise with the Mainland authorities to expand the Bond  Connect (Southbound Trading) as appropriate, including expanding  the scope of eligible Mainland investors to non‑bank financial  institutions such as securities firms and insurance companies; and  enriching liquidity management tools that facilitate offshore investors’  investment in onshore bonds by actively exploring and introducing,  at appropriate juncture, various bond repo and collateral products  and arrangements using onshore RMB bonds.
Further Enhance Our Status as an International Risk Management  Centre 
37. Hong Kong has the highest concentration of insurance companies and  the highest insurance density in Asia. To further strengthen Hong Kong’s position  as a global risk management centre, the Insurance Authority will initiate a review  next year. We will examine capital requirements for infrastructure investment,  enriching insurance companies’ asset allocation for risk diversification and driving  investment in infrastructure such as the Northern Metropolis. We will also continue  to invite Mainland and overseas enterprises, including large state‑owned enterprises  in the Mainland, to establish captive insurers in Hong Kong. 
Further Enhance Our Status as an International Asset and Wealth  Management Centre 
38. There are 2 700 single‑family offices in Hong Kong, and the industry has  predicted that Hong Kong will become the world’s largest cross‑boundary wealth  management centre by 2028. We will make every effort to attract more global  capital to be managed in Hong Kong, including facilitating the opening of new  distribution channels for private equity funds through HKEX’s listing, and: 
(i) collaborating with sovereign wealth funds in regions along the  Belt and Road (B&R) – We will strive to collaborate with large‑scale  sovereign wealth funds in regions such as the Middle East, in  financing the setting up of funds to invest in assets in the Mainland  and other regions; 
(ii) enhancing the New Capital Investment Entrant Scheme – Effective  today, investment in residential properties is allowed provided that  the transaction price of the residential property concerned is no less  than $50 million, with the amount of real estate investment to be  counted towards the total capital investment capped at $10 million.  In addition, investments made through an eligible private company  wholly owned by an applicant will be counted towards the  applicant’s eligible investment with effect from 1 March 2025; and 
(iii) expanding the scope of tax concessions – The Government will  consult the industry on the proposal to add qualifying transactions  eligible for tax concessions for funds and single‑family offices.
Proactively Expand Markets and Deepen Overseas Networks 39. We will continue to actively expand and deepen our overseas networks,  including forging financial co‑operation with the Middle East and the region of the  Association of South East Asian Nations (ASEAN), organising more international  financial mega events, and exploring further collaboration with Islamic markets in  the area of finance. 
Further Enhance the Securities Market 
40. Relevant measures include: 
(i) opening up new sources of capital overseas – Exchange Traded  Funds (ETF) tracking Hong Kong stock indices will be launched in  the Middle East, seeking to attract allocation of capital in the market  to Hong Kong stocks; 
(ii) striving for more listing of enterprises in Hong Kong – We will  leverage the advantages brought about by our mutual access with  the Mainland’s financial markets to attract international enterprises  to list in Hong Kong. We will also encourage large‑scale Mainland  enterprises to list here, particularly aiming to have more prominent  initial public offerings in the near term; 
(iii) optimising vetting of listing applications – The Securities and Futures  Commission (SFC) and the HKEX will announce specific measures for  further optimising relevant procedures to provide greater certainty  regarding the time required for vetting of listing applications; and 
(iv) boosting market efficiency – The SFC and the HKEX will boost  market efficiency and lower transaction costs, including reviewing the  arrangement for deposit of margin, and refining the requirements on  placement of margin and collateral. 
Provide Convenient Cross-boundary Financial Services Arrangement 41. To promote financial inclusion, we will facilitate members of the public  in making cross‑boundary transactions and payments. The HKMA and the  People’s Bank of China are pushing forward the linkage of fast payment systems  in the two places, i.e. the Faster Payment System (FPS) in Hong Kong and the  Internet Banking Payment System (IBPS) in the Mainland, to facilitate real‑time,  cross‑boundary small‑value payments by residents on both sides; and they will  implement the arrangement enabling issuance of bank cards by Mainland branches  of Hong Kong‑incorporated banks in the Mainland.
Build an International Gold Trading Market 
42. Hong Kong ranks among the world’s largest import and export markets  for gold by volume. Amidst the increasingly complicated geopolitics, our city’s  security and stability gives us a clear edge as an attractive place for physical  gold storage, driving more gold trading, settlement and delivery activities, and  potentially propelling Hong Kong into a gold trading centre. This will spur  development of the related industry chain, ranging from investment transactions,  derivatives, insurance, storage, to trading and logistic services. 
43. The Government will promote the development of world‑class gold  storage facilities, facilitating the storage and delivery of spot gold by users and  investors in Hong Kong, and driving demand for related services such as collateral  and loan businesses, opening up new growth areas of the financial sector. 
44. The Financial Services and the Treasury Bureau (FSTB) will set up a  working group to take forward the establishment of an international gold trading  centre. This will include, among other things, strengthening the trading mechanism  and regulatory framework, promoting application of cutting‑edge financial  technology, and actively exploring with the Mainland authorities on the inclusion of  gold‑related products in the mutual market access programme. 
Enhance the Green Finance Ecosystem 
45. Hong Kong is a leading sustainable finance hub in Asia. The  international carbon market (Core Climate) launched by the HKEX is the world’s  only carbon market to offer Hong Kong dollar (HKD) and RMB settlement for  trading of international voluntary carbon credits. 
46. The HKMA will roll out the Sustainable Finance Action Agenda. In  addition, the FSTB will launch a roadmap on the full adoption of the International  Financial Reporting Standards – Sustainability Disclosure Standards (ISSB  Standards) this year, leading Hong Kong to be among the first jurisdictions to align  its local requirements with ISSB Standards. 
(B) International Shipping Centre 
47. Hong Kong is one of the world’s busiest and most efficient ports, and  ranks fourth in the International Shipping Centre Development Index (ISCDI). The  average length of stay of container vessels in the Hong Kong port is 0.95 days,  about half the average of 1.85 days for the world’s top 20 container ports, earning  our city the reputation as a “catch‑up port” for vessels to make up for delays in  other ports. 
48. The shipping business is composed of the port sector and maritime  services, in which maritime services (including professional services such as ship  broking, financing and leasing, maritime insurance, maritime law and arbitration)  are the high‑value‑added segment of shipping business and the source of growth,  having grown by nearly 40% over the past three years (from 2019 to 2022) in terms  of economic contribution. We will step up our efforts in fostering Hong Kong’s  maritime industry while taking a multi‑pronged approach to consolidate our status  as an international shipping centre. 
Establish the Hong Kong Maritime and Port Development Board 49. The existing Hong Kong Maritime and Port Board will be reconstituted  into the “Hong Kong Maritime and Port Development Board”, a high‑level advisory  body to assist the Government in formulating policies and long‑term development  strategies. To be chaired by a non‑official member, with other members largely  from the maritime sector, the new body will be underpinned by dedicated staff to  undertake research and publicity work. Additional funding will be provided to  enhance its research capabilities, strengthen its Mainland and overseas promotional  work and step up manpower training, supporting the Government in policy  implementation more effectively and promoting the sustainable development of  Hong Kong’s maritime industry. 
Promote Development of High Value-added Maritime Services 50. We will strive to promote the development of high value‑added maritime  and professional services. Indeed, the Government has been encouraging more  shipping commercial principals and maritime service enterprises to establish  presence in Hong Kong by providing tax exemptions for ship leasing business  and offering half‑rate tax concessions for marine insurance, ship management,  ship agency and ship broking. We will continue to boost Hong Kong’s maritime  strengths. Relevant measures include: 
(i) enhancing and promoting tax concessions – To strengthen the  local maritime ecosystem, we will step up promotion of existing  tax concessionary measures for maritime services and enhance the  preferential tax regime (including introducing new tax deduction  arrangements for ship lessors pursuant to international tax rules); 
(ii) attracting maritime service enterprises to establish presence in  Hong Kong – We will encourage leading or high‑potential marine  insurance business operators to establish presence in our city to  broaden the range of marine insurance products; and
14 
(iii) developing maritime services talents – We will strengthen  collaboration with international marine insurance organisations to  promote the training of marine insurance talents, and expand the  scope of the Maritime and Aviation Training Fund to cover more  green energy courses, marine insurance examinations, and others. 
Advance Development of Green Maritime Centre 
51. We will develop Hong Kong into a green maritime centre through: 
(i) promoting the green transformation of registered ships – The  Marine Department earlier this year began offering cash incentives  to ships meeting relevant international standards on decarbonisation,  and it will step up promotion of this initiative; 
(ii) developing a green maritime fuel bunkering centre – We will  promulgate the Action Plan on Green Maritime Fuel Bunkering by  the end of this year. We will take forward the related infrastructural  development such as green maritime fuel bunker terminals, promote  port emissions reduction, offer incentives to encourage green  maritime fuel usage, co‑operate with ports in the GBA, and construct  a green shipping corridor with major trading partners; and 
(iii) offering green fuel bunkering facilities – We will provide green ships  with smart information concerning navigational safety, and enhance  the ship monitoring systems to ensure safety during fuel bunkering. 
Create a Commodity Trading Ecosystem 
52. Commodities including metals and minerals account for more than half  of the global shipping trade volume. Shipowners and commodity traders are the  key users of shipping routes and maritime services. Their presence and operation in  Hong Kong can drive the maritime services industry, and boost demand for related  financial and professional services such as hedging activities of related futures  products, conducive to consolidating and enhancing Hong Kong’s status as an  international financial, shipping and trade centre. We will explore the introduction  of tax concessions and support measures to attract relevant enterprises in the  Mainland and overseas to set up businesses in Hong Kong, building a commodity  trading ecosystem in our city. 
53. There has been an international commodity exchange expressing its  intention to establish accredited warehouses in Hong Kong for storage and delivery  of commodities, including non‑ferrous metal products. We will capitalise on this 
15 
opportunity to establish relevant supporting facilities so as to attract Mainland  enterprises to engage in commodity trade, especially of non‑ferrous metal, in  Hong Kong, further expanding the demand for our maritime and trade services. 
Develop the Smart Port and Conduct International Promotions 54. The Government will complete installation of a port community system  next year. It will be equipped with functions such as shipment tracking, real‑time  transport information, electronic information and document retrieval, and port data  analysis, enabling the flow and sharing of data among stakeholders in the maritime,  port and logistics industries. 
55. The Government will also organise more major events with international  maritime organisations and enterprises to showcase to the world Hong Kong’s  maritime strengths. 
Expand High Value-added Logistics Services 
56. We are taking forward the Action Plan on Modern Logistics  Development, and will release four quality logistics sites for industry to develop  modern, high‑end, multi‑storey logistics facilities. The findings of the planning  study on the development of modern logistics clusters in the Hung Shui Kiu/Ha  Tsuen New Development Area (NDA) will be published next year. 
57. The Government will continue to strengthen co‑operation in the logistics  sector with the western part of Guangdong and other neighbouring areas, making  good use of the Hong Kong‑Zhuhai‑Macao Bridge (HZMB) to expand the catchment  area of our cargo services and facilitate more goods to go through Hong Kong. 
(C) International Trade Centre 
58. The global trade landscape is undergoing constant changes, with parts  of the supply chains shifting to the Global South and B&R countries, while many  Mainland enterprises are also actively establishing their presence abroad. 59. Hong Kong topped the global rankings in international trade and  business legislation, according to the World Competitiveness Yearbook 2024. We  have been the prime destination for Mainland and overseas enterprises setting up  international headquarters to manage offshore trading and supply chain businesses.
16 
Build a High Value-added Supply Chain Service Centre 60. Hong Kong is home to a deep pool of talents and extensive networks  in offshore trading and supply chain management, including production chain  management, export credit risk management, trade financing, marketing, testing  and certification, accounting and other professional services. We will strengthen the  provision of high value‑added supply chain services by: 
(i) establishing a high value‑added supply chain services mechanism –  The Invest Hong Kong (InvestHK) and the Hong Kong Trade  Development Council (HKTDC) will set up a mechanism and  enhance the interface for attracting Mainland enterprises to establish  international or regional headquarters in Hong Kong, providing  one‑stop, diversified professional advisory services for enterprises in  Hong Kong looking to go global; 
(ii) providing greater export protection for enterprises – The statutory  maximum indemnity percentage of the Hong Kong Export Credit  Insurance Corporation (ECIC) will be increased from 90% to 95%.  The ECIC will also provide more free buyer credit checks with  extended geographical coverage, and enhance financing support for  e‑commerce businesses; 
(iii) providing robust export credit services – We will encourage the  China Export & Credit Insurance Corporation to explore setting up  businesses in Hong Kong, providing export credit insurance services  covering overseas investment with prolonged investment period,  offering Mainland enterprises in Hong Kong venturing overseas  markets and foreign‑funded companies doing businesses in Mainland  market with more comprehensive export credit services; 
(iv) promoting electronic trade financing – The HKMA is experimenting  with tokenised electronic bills of lading through its Project Ensemble  Sandbox. The goal is to lower fraud risks through the better use  of technology and to facilitate the provision of trade financing by  financial institutions. The HKMA will work with other jurisdictions  on a pilot basis to develop mechanisms for trade information  transmission, promoting cross‑boundary data transfers and the  digitalisation of international trade. It will also allow potential  stablecoin issuers to test blockchain use cases, including solutions for  cross‑boundary payments through the stablecoin issuer sandbox; and
17 
(v) enhancing financial services with data – The HKMA expects to  connect its Commercial Data Interchange (CDI) with the system of the  Land Registry next year to facilitate enhancement of banking services  through the better use of data. 
Expand Our Global Economic and Trade Networks 
61. In addition to developing the European and American markets, we  will continue to expand our economic and trade networks, especially with B&R  countries. Relevant measures include: 
(i) further opening up of trade in services with the Mainland – Under  the Second Agreement Concerning Amendment to the Mainland  and Hong Kong Closer Economic Partnership Arrangement (CEPA)  Agreement on Trade in Services (Amendment Agreement II) signed  recently, further liberalisation measures have been introduced across  several services sectors. These include the construction, testing  and certification, financial services, film, and television sectors. In  particular, the period requirement of substantive business operations  in Hong Kong for three years has been removed in most services  sectors. This will attract more Hong Kong start‑ups, overseas  enterprises, and talents from around the world to establish their  presence in Hong Kong to tap the Mainland market.   We will  implement the Amendment Agreement II, step up promotion and  provide assistance to enterprises as needed; 
(ii) reinforcing the interface of trade mechanisms – We will continue  to seek early accession to the Regional Comprehensive Economic  Partnership (RCEP). We are also in investment agreement  negotiations with Bangladesh and Saudi Arabia, and plan to begin  negotiations with Egypt and Peru. Our free trade agreement (FTA)  negotiations with Peru have been concluded and we expect to sign  the FTA this year. We will also expand the global network of our  Economic and Trade Offices, focusing on establishing economic and  trade ties with emerging markets; and 
(iii) further exploring priority markets – We will continue to pay visits  and lead business and professional services delegations to priority  markets such as B&R countries. We will also organise the B&R  Cross‑professional Forum to promote Hong Kong’s professional  services.
18 
Promote Development of a Headquarters Economy 
62. The Government will step up efforts to bring in strategic enterprises  from outside the city to set up headquarters or corporate divisions in Hong Kong.  The FSTB will submit a bill this year to introduce a company re‑domiciliation  mechanism obviating the need for companies intending to re‑domicile in  Hong Kong to be wound up in its original domicile overseas and establish a new  company in Hong Kong. The companies will be able to preserve their legal identity  and business continuity, saving cost as a result of the simplified procedures. 
63. The validity period of multiple‑entry visas for foreign staff of companies  registered in Hong Kong, including non‑permanent residents, will be extended  to a maximum of five years to facilitate their visit to the Mainland, and their  applications will enjoy priority processing. 
64. We will strengthen the range of financial services available for Mainland  enterprises in Hong Kong wishing to expand overseas, encouraging Mainland  financial enterprises to co‑ordinate and manage their overseas business in  Hong Kong and facilitating their internationalisation. The HKMA is exploring  ways to enable Mainland enterprises looking to go global to enjoy facilitation of  cross‑boundary RMB settlement and financing through enhanced offshore RMB  liquidity, utilising technology and promoting international collaboration. 
Foster Trading of Liquor 
65. At present, Hong Kong imposes a duty of 100% on the import price  of liquor (with alcoholic strength of more than 30%). To promote liquor trade  and boost the development of high value‑added industries including logistics  and storage, tourism as well as high‑end food and beverage consumption, the  Government has made reference to the successful experience of driving the wine  trade through exemption of wine duty, and will, starting today, reduce the duty rate  for liquor with an import price of over $200 from 100% to 10% for the portion above  $200, while the duty rate for the portion of $200 and below, as well as liquor with  an import price of $200 or below will remain unchanged. 
(D) International Aviation Hub 
66. As an international aviation hub, Hong Kong is connected to nearly  200 destinations worldwide. Our city has topped the global ranking for air cargo  throughput for more than a decade. 
67. The Airport Authority Hong Kong (AAHK) will complete the  Three‑Runway System by the end of this year. From 2035, the Hong Kong  International Airport (HKIA)’s capacity will increase by 50%.
19 
Enhance Aviation Development Strategies 
68. The Government will step up efforts in expanding our aviation network  by supporting the HKIA to explore new destinations and flights, particularly  enhancing co‑operation with civil aviation counterparts from B&R countries. In  parallel, we will combine the strengths of our airport and Zhuhai Airport to  improve the Fly‑Via‑Zhuhai‑Hong Kong direct passenger service and jointly  develop international air cargo business for greater synergy. 
Develop a World-leading Airport City 
69. The Government will plan with the AAHK for expanding the scale of the  Airport City by more than double, building a new, world‑leading landmark in the  bay area among the Airport Island, the Hong Kong Port Island of the HZMB and  Tung Chung East New Town. New projects will be developed to promote high‑end  commercial, tourist and leisure activities. These include creating an ecosystem  for the arts industry, building the AsiaWorld‑Expo Phase 2, developing a yacht  bay with ancillary facilities, opening a food market for imported fresh food and  providing more public spaces. 
Expand Cargo Capacity through the GBA and Enhance Advantages of  the Air Cargo Industry 
70. The AAHK is pressing ahead in full steam with the innovative  development of a sea‑air intermodal cargo‑transhipment mode in collaboration  with Dongguan. The initial stage of first‑phase construction for the permanent  logistics park in Dongguan, the HKIA Dongguan Logistics Park, will be completed  by the end of next year, and the cargo‑handling capacity will progressively reach  one million tonnes per annum. Advance planning will be made to commence  the second‑phase development, introducing more high value‑added logistics,  cross‑boundary e‑commerce and courier service facilities. 
71. The Government will extend arrangements under the Air Transhipment  Cargo Exemption Scheme to other intermodal cargo‑transhipment modes to boost  competitiveness.
20 
(E) Regional Centre for International Legal and Dispute  Resolution Services 
Commence Training for International Legal Talents 
72. The Hong Kong International Legal Talents Training Academy will be  officially launched this year, cultivating legal talents to be familiar with international  law, common law, civil law, national legal systems and other legal aspects. The  dedicated office and expert committee under the Department of Justice (DoJ) are  pressing ahead with the related work. 
Step up Promotion of Mediation Services 
73. The International Organization for Mediation will have its headquarters  set up in Hong Kong upon adoption and entry into force of the relevant  international convention. The Government will enhance the system on local  accreditation and disciplinary matters of the mediation profession to further  strengthen our role as an international mediation centre. We will incorporate  mediation clauses in government contracts and encourage private organisations to  make reference to and adopt such clauses. We will also launch the Pilot Scheme  on Community Mediation to offer more training opportunities for promoting  mediation culture. 
Develop a Sports Dispute Resolution System 
74. With the development of sports activities and industry, sports  disputes have become increasingly complicated. We will explore establishing a  sports dispute resolution system and promote sports arbitration, leveraging the  institutional advantages of Hong Kong in dispute resolution.
21 
IV. Develop New Quality Productive Forces  Tailored to Local Conditions 
75. The core element of new quality productive forces is to achieve  high‑quality economic development through technological empowerment.  Hong Kong is striving to become an international innovation and technology (I&T)  centre by promoting the upgrading and transformation of traditional industries  while actively nurturing emerging ones. We will spare no effort in developing new  quality productive forces tailored to local conditions. 
(A) International I&T Centre 
Optimise the Strategy and Institutional Set-up for the Development of  New Industrialisation 
76. We will draw up a medium to long‑term development plan for new  industrialisation in Hong Kong. We will also press ahead with the establishment  of the Hong Kong New Industrialisation Development Alliance to promote closer  collaboration among the Government and the industry, academia, research and  investment sectors, building a co‑operative platform for new industrialisation in  Hong Kong. This includes providing more financing opportunities and fostering  I&T co‑operation between newly‑listed companies in Hong Kong and local  universities. 
Establish the Third InnoHK Research Cluster 
77. The InnoHK research clusters have become home to about 2 500 research  and development (R&D) personnel from Hong Kong and around the world. The  Government has already started preparatory work to establish the third InnoHK  research cluster, which will focus on advanced manufacturing, materials, energy  and sustainable development. The target is to attract world‑class R&D teams to  collaborate with local institutions, promoting R&D and bringing in talents. 
Increase Research Funding 
78. The Government will launch a new round of Research Matching Grant  Scheme totalling $1.5  billion to attract more organisations to support research  endeavours of institutions.
22 
Increase Investment for I&T Industries 
79. We will increase investment and guide more market capital to invest in  I&T industries, reflecting a revamped approach of Government in this. Relevant  measures include: 
(i) setting up a $10 billion I&T Industry‑Oriented Fund – We will set up  a fund‑of‑funds to channel more market capital to invest in specified  emerging and future industries of strategic importance, including  life and health technology, AI and robotics, semi‑conductors and  smart devices, advanced materials and new energy. The goal is to  systematically build an I&T ecosystem; 
(ii) optimising the Innovation and Technology Venture Fund – We will  redeploy $1.5 billion to set up funds jointly with the market, on a  matching basis, investing in start‑ups of strategic industries, to further  enhance Hong Kong’s start‑up ecosystem; and 
(iii) maximising the impact of the HKIC as “patient capital” – The HKIC  will continue to attract I&T enterprises to establish their presence and  settle in Hong Kong by channelling and leveraging market capital. 
Attract International Start-up Accelerators to Establish a Presence in  Hong Kong 
80. The Government will launch the I&T Accelerator Pilot Scheme with  a funding allocation of $180 million at a one‑to‑two matching ratio between the  Government and the institution, up to a subsidy ceiling of $30 million. The Scheme  aims to attract professional start‑up service providers with proven track records in  and beyond Hong Kong to set up accelerator bases in Hong Kong, fostering the  robust growth of start‑ups. 
Develop the Low-altitude Economy 
81. Low‑altitude economy, which refers to economic activities in airspace  below 1 000 metres, presents a wide array of application scenarios including  rescues, surveys and delivery of goods and passengers. Formulating a management  system for low‑altitude economy will help drive development in areas such  as telecommunication technologies, AI and the digital industry, unlocking the  low‑altitude airspace as a new production factor for our economy. 
82. The Government will establish the Working Group on Developing  Low‑altitude Economy. Led by the Deputy Financial Secretary, it will formulate  development strategies and inter‑departmental action plans, starting with projects 
23 
on low‑altitude applications. It will designate specific venues for such purposes,  draw up regulations and design the institutional set-up, and study and map out  plans to develop the required infrastructure and networks. Relevant measures  include: 
(i) exploring low‑altitude flying application scenarios – We will  press ahead with pilot projects and designate venues to explore  deploying drones for delivery, surveys, building maintenance, aerial  photography, performances, search and rescue, and other possibilities; 
(ii) amending relevant regulations – This includes relaxing restrictions  on beyond‑line‑of‑sight flying activities, as well as those on weight  and loading of drones, encouraging market research and investment,  facilitating technology tests and developing aerial tours; 
(iii) promoting interface with the Mainland – We will explore with  the Mainland authorities the joint establishment of low‑altitude  cross‑boundary air routes, immigration and customs clearance  arrangements and supporting infrastructure; and 
(iv) studying and planning for low‑altitude infrastructure – In the  long run, we need a highly effective, intelligent and digitalised  low‑altitude infrastructure system for the real‑time management on  networks of low‑altitude activities. It will strategise solutions for  complex management and safety issues arising from such activities.  The working group will embark on technical studies and planning  of support facilities for low‑altitude activities (such as vertiports  and charging stations), communications network, air route network,  management of low‑altitude flying activities and so on to lay the  foundation for the low altitude economy. 
Promote Development of Communications Technology 83. Low Earth Orbit (LEO) satellites are less costly than traditional ones. The  Government will conduct a study on streamlining the vetting procedures of licence  applications for operating LEO satellites. The Government will also make available  more suitable radio spectrum to the market in a timely manner. 
Advance R&D of Aerospace Science and Technology 
84. Hong Kong’s research teams have been actively engaged in R&D of  aerospace science and technology. This year, a Hong Kong resident was selected  as a preparatory astronaut. We are very grateful for our country’s support for 
24 
Hong Kong in developing aerospace‑related technologies. The Government will  set up a research centre under the InnoHK research cluster to participate in the  Chang’E‑8 mission, contributing to national aerospace development. 
Promote Development of New Energy 
85. The Government will earmark around $750  million under the New  Energy Transport Fund to subsidise the taxi trade and franchised bus companies to  purchase electric vehicles, and launch the Subsidy Scheme for Trials of Hydrogen  Fuel Cell Electric Heavy Vehicles. 
86. We will further promote the development of new energy by: 
(i) setting a target for sustainable aviation fuel (SAF) consumption – We  will speed up the reduction of carbon emissions by the aviation  industry and cater to the increasing demand of international airlines  for SAF; 
(ii) developing SAF and green maritime fuel supply chains – We will  formulate the long‑term plan for industry development in respect of  fuel supply and demand, storage and bunkering; and 
(iii) promoting green and low carbon hydrogen energy – We will actively  support the industry to establish a solar‑to‑hydrogen facility for  demonstration, introduce a bill next year to ensure the safe use of  hydrogen fuel, and formulate the approach of hydrogen standard  certification suitable to Hong Kong. 
(B) Regional Intellectual Property Trading Centre 87. Hong Kong’s intellectual property (IP)‑intensive industries accounted for  about 30% of our Gross Domestic Product and of total employment respectively.  We will strengthen our position as a regional IP trading centre by expanding the IP  trading ecosystem of the I&T sector and creative industries. 
Enhance the Legislative Framework for IP 
88. The Government will strengthen protection for the products of innovation  and creativity yielded by R&D efforts. Measures include putting forward a  proposal next year to enhance the Copyright Ordinance regarding the protection  for AI technology development, launching a consultation in 2025 on the registered  designs regime currently under review, and proposing legislative amendments to  streamline IP litigation processes for the High Court to manage and hear these cases  more effectively.
25 
89. Next year, the Trade Marks Registry under the Intellectual Property  Department (IPD) will launch a new AI‑assisted image search service to facilitate  the public’s search of the trademark database. 
90. With the Central Government’s support, Hong Kong will participate in  the World Intellectual Property Organization Lex‑Judgments Database next year,  sharing important IP case precedents of local courts, to showcase to the international  community the quality of our IP‑related judicial judgments. 
Strengthen Training of IP Talents 
91. The Government will continue to discuss with the patent agent sector  and stakeholders to plan for the introduction of regulatory arrangements for local  patent agent services, covering qualification, registration, and other areas, aiming to  nurture professional talents and enhance service quality. 
92. The IPD will collaborate with the Qualifications Framework Secretariat  to develop practical teaching materials for deployment by training providers,  benefitting personnel across 23 different industries. 
(C) International Health and Medical Innovation Hub 93. To expedite patients’ access to advanced diagnostic and treatment  services, and to foster new quality productive forces in biomedical technology,  the Government will complement technological innovation with institutional  innovation, developing Hong Kong into an international health and medical  innovation hub. 
Reform the Approval Mechanism for Drugs and Medical Devices 94. The Government will expedite the reform of the approval mechanism for  drugs and medical devices, including: 
(i) extending the “1+” mechanism to all new drugs, including vaccines  and advanced therapy products, and improving the approval  mechanism to speed up registration, facilitating good drugs for use in  Hong Kong; 
(ii) devising the timetable for the Hong Kong Centre for Medical  Products Regulation and the roadmap towards adoption of “primary  evaluation”, as well as formulating strategies and measures to  facilitate R&D of drugs and medical devices; and 
(iii) taking forward preparatory work for legislating for the statutory  regulation of medical devices.
26 
Strengthen Biomedical Technology R&D and Translation 95. The Government will enhance Hong Kong’s clinical trial capability on  all fronts and facilitate the translation of innovative biomedical research results into  clinical applications by: 
(i) joining hands with Shenzhen to establish the GBA Clinical Trial  Collaboration Platform, extending the R&D network and expediting  clinical trials; 
(ii) establishing the Real‑World Study and Application Centre to open  up local health and medical databases and promote co‑operation  between Hong Kong and Shenzhen to integrate data generated from  the “special measure of using Hong Kong‑registered drugs and  medical devices used in Hong Kong public hospitals in GBA”. This  will accelerate approval for registration of new drugs in Hong Kong,  the Mainland and overseas; and 
(iii) supporting R&D, clinical trials and application of advanced  biomedical technology in Hong Kong, attracting global top‑notch  innovative enterprises and research organisations to set up operations  in Hong Kong. 
(D) Promote Integrated Development of Digital Economy and  Real Economy 
96. A robust system to promote integration of real economy and digital  economy is one of the key drivers of new quality productive forces. The Government  will expedite the development of digital economy, which includes accelerating the  digital transformation of industries, strengthening digital infrastructure, exploring  development of a data‑trading ecosystem, and exploring on a pilot basis facilitation  arrangements for cross‑boundary data flow within the GBA. 
Accelerate Development of Digital Trade 
97. The Government will push forward reforms in the digitalisation of  enterprises and trade. Measures include fostering participation in discussions  among the international community about the development of digital economy and  exploring the inclusion of relevant provisions in bilateral trade agreements during  the negotiation process, with a view to promoting digital trade and cross‑boundary  e‑commerce.
27 
98. The Commerce and Economic Development Bureau is developing the  Trade Single Window to provide a one‑stop electronic platform. It will help the  industry lodge import and export trade documents for trade declaration and  customs clearance. Separately, the HKMA has established a working group to  conduct an in‑depth study into the changes in future supply chains and make  recommendations. The scope of study covers promoting the digitalisation of trade  through areas such as talents and financial infrastructure, as well as the technology  and legal framework, with the goal to lower trade cost and upgrade the trade  ecosystem. 
Establish a New Fintech Innovation Ecosystem 
99. The Government will continue to promote the development of innovative  financial services including Central Bank Digital Currencies (CBDCs), mobile  payment, virtual banks, virtual insurance and virtual asset (VA) transactions. The  FSTB will shortly issue a policy statement, setting out its policy stance regarding the  application of AI in the financial market. Other measures include: 
(i) promoting the use of CBDCs for cross‑boundary payment – The  HKMA is actively testing and exploring more add‑on technology  solutions and use cases related to cross‑boundary trade settlement  on the mBridge platform, and will further widen the participation of  both the public and private sectors; 
(ii) enhancing the regulation of VA trading – The FSTB will complete  the second round public consultation on the regulatory proposals for  over‑the‑counter trading of VA and put forward a proposed licensing  regime for VA custodian service providers; 
(iii) promoting real‑world asset tokenisation and developing a digital  money ecosystem – The HKMA is taking forward Project Ensemble,  a financial market infrastructure project, to explore the application  of real‑world asset tokenisation and the use of digital money for  interbank settlement, facilitating the development of the relevant  asset trading. Separately, the HKMA also allows potential stablecoin  issuers to test business plans and use‑cases through the stablecoin  issuer sandbox, and will work with the FSTB to introduce a bill on  the regulation of fiat‑referenced stablecoin issuers later this year; and 
(iv) promoting the development of the digital securities market – The  HKMA will soon launch the Digital Bond Grant Scheme to encourage  more financial institutions and issuers to adopt tokenisation  technology in capital market transactions.
28 
Facilitate Cross-boundary E-commerce Logistics Services 100. To develop Hong Kong into a cross‑boundary e‑commerce logistics and  distribution centre, the Government will review existing procedures to enhance the  efficiency of cross‑boundary goods’ distribution, strengthening the competitiveness  of our city. 
Promote Smart Construction and Management of Public Rental  Housing Estates 
101. The Hong Kong Housing Authority (HKHA) has selected 10 Public  Rental Housing (PRH) estates as pilot sites for smart estate management. Next  year, it will establish a central platform for property management and introduce  digital technologies in daily estate management work, enhancing management  effectiveness and service quality. The HKHA will also progressively apply the  Project Information Management and Analytics Platform in new public housing  projects starting next year, enhancing works efficiency by project management  digitalisation and adopting three‑dimensional digital maps and virtual digital  models, etc. 
Promote LawTech 
102. The DoJ will set up the Advisory Group on Promoting the Development  of LawTech to formulate policies and measures on LawTech and promote its  application in relevant sectors.
29 
V. Build Hong Kong into an International Hub  for High-calibre Talents 
(A) Co-ordinate and Promote Integrated Development of  Education, Technology and Talents 
103. Education nurtures our future, technology denotes our strength, and  talents lead our development. The Government will set up the Committee on  Education, Technology and Talents. Led by the Chief Secretary for Administration,  the committee will co‑ordinate and drive the integrated development of education,  technology and talents, expand connections, formulate policies to attract and  cultivate talents, foster the development of technologies, and also promote  Hong Kong as an international hub for high-calibre talents. 
(B) Attract Talents 
104. Hong Kong boasts five of the world’s top 100 universities and is an  international hub for exchange and collaboration among high‑calibre talents. 
Trawl for Talents 
105. The Government implemented a new talent admission regime in late  2022. More than 380 000 applications have been received to date, and around  160 000 talents have arrived in Hong Kong with their families. 
106. In the next five years, there will be a projected shortage of around  180 000 workers across different sectors. To build a quality talent pool for  development, we will reform various aspects of the talent admission regime,  including: 
(i) updating the Talent List to include talents required for development  of the “eight centres”; 
(ii) expanding the list of universities under the Top Talent Pass Scheme to  198 universities by adding 13 top Mainland and overseas universities,  and extending the validity period of the first visa of high‑income  talents under the scheme from two years to three years;
30 
(iii) enhancing the General Employment Policy and the Admission  Scheme for Mainland Talents and Professionals, providing new  channels to attract experienced specialists in specific skilled trades  facing acute manpower shortage to come to Hong Kong. There will  be a quota under the new arrangement; 
(iv) introducing a new mechanism under the Quality Migrant Admission  Scheme, proactively inviting top‑notch talents to come to our city  for development, promoting Hong Kong as the focal point of  international high‑calibre talents; and 
(v) extending for two years the pilot arrangement of including graduates  from the GBA campuses of Hong Kong universities under the  Immigration Arrangements for Non‑local Graduates. 
Assist Talents in Pursuing Development in Hong Kong 107. The HKTE will step up promotion of its online platforms to offer  comprehensive information on salaries, taxation, education, visas and so on, in  addition to providing personalised assistance. The HKTE will expand its network  of collaborative partners and organise online and in‑person job fairs with industries  and employer organisations, so that employers can directly match jobs with talents.  It will also organise another international talent forum and conduct overseas  promotion. 
Promote Development of an International Hub for Post-secondary  Education 
Nurture Future Talents and Establish the “Study in Hong Kong” Brand 108. The Government is committed to developing Hong Kong into an  international hub for post‑secondary education. Relevant measures include: 
(i) incentivising more local students to pursue advanced studies – We  will set up the Hong Kong Future Talents Scholarship Scheme for  Advanced Studies, beginning in the 2025/26 academic year, offering  scholarships each year to up to 1 200 local students enrolling in  designated postgraduate programmes; 
(ii) creating the “Study in Hong Kong” brand – We will strive to host  international education conferences and exhibitions. We will also  encourage local post‑secondary institutions to enhance collaboration  and exchange with their counterparts around the world in promoting  the “Study in Hong Kong” brand on a global scale, and to attract 
31 
more overseas students, especially those from ASEAN and other B&R  countries, to study in our city through the provision of scholarships  and other incentives; and 
(iii) improving hostel facilities – We will launch a pilot scheme to  streamline the processing of application in relation to planning,  lands and building plans, so as to encourage the market to convert  hotels and other commercial buildings into student hostels on a  self‑financing and privately‑funded basis, increasing the supply of  student hostels. The Government will also make available suitable  sites for the private sector to build new hostels, having regard to  market demand. The Development Projects Facilitation Office under  the Development Bureau (DEVB) will provide one‑stop advisory and  facilitation services for these projects. 
Promote Quality Development of Self-financing Institutions 109. We will introduce a bill next year to amend the Post Secondary Colleges  Ordinance, to improve the regulatory and quality assurance mechanisms of  self‑financing post‑secondary institutions. 
Develop the Northern Metropolis University Town 
110. The Government has earmarked over 80 hectares of land in the Northern  Metropolis for the Northern Metropolis University Town, and will encourage local  post‑secondary institutions to introduce more branded programmes, research  collaboration and exchange projects with renowned Mainland and overseas  institutions in a flexible and innovative manner. We will retain flexibility in the  planning process to facilitate development of student hostels. We plan to publish  the Northern Metropolis University Town Development Conceptual Framework in  the first half of 2026. 
(C) Nurture Talents 
Promote Multiple Pathways 
Advance the Development of Universities of Applied Sciences 111. The Hong Kong Metropolitan University has been recognised as the  first university of applied sciences (UAS) in Hong Kong. The UAS alliance will  be established this year to, among other things, embark on joint promotion and  strengthen collaboration with UASs around the world. The Government has  allocated a start‑up fund of $100 million for the alliance.
32 
Expand Our Vocational Talent Pool 
112. The Government will build a campus for the newly established  Hong Kong Institute of Information Technology, under the Vocational Training  Council, and develop its Lift and Escalator Technology Centre. 
Promote STEAM Education in Primary and Secondary Schools 113. The EDB will establish the Steering Committee on Strategic Development  of Digital Education to promote digital education, renew the Junior Secondary  Science Curriculum and provide support for teachers in using AI in teaching. 
Enhance Support for Schools, Teachers and Students 
114. The Government will allocate $2 billion to set up the Teacher Professional  Development Fund to support the long‑term development of the teaching  profession, and to enhance the training and exchange programmes for teachers.  A provision of about $470 million will be allocated to enhance the learning and  teaching of English, Putonghua and other languages. We will also strengthen  support for students with special educational needs and continue to provide  subsidies such as textbook assistance for students with financial needs. 
Expedite Youth Hostel Projects 
115. In response to our young people’s aspirations to have their own living  space, the Government launched the Youth Hostel Scheme and expanded it two  years ago by subsidising non‑governmental organisations (NGOs) to rent suitable  hotels and guesthouses for use as youth hostels. We have also set up a task force  to offer targeted support and technical advice, including providing relevant NGOs  with assistance in negotiating with hotel owners to expedite agreements. The  number of hostel places has now increased to about 3 000. 
Support Young People to Purchase Subsidised Sale Flats 116. The HKHA will allocate an extra ballot number to young family  applicants and one‑person applicants aged below 40 with White Form status for the  purchase of Home Ownership Scheme (HOS) flats from the next HOS sale exercise  onwards. Starting from the next White Form Secondary Market Scheme (WSM)  exercise, the WSM quota will increase by 1 500, all of which will be allocated to  young family applicants and one‑person applicants aged below 40.
33 
Strengthen Support for Youth Development 
117. We will create, among others, the “Youth Post” hostel and spaces for  cultural and arts exchanges for youths in the Kai Tak Community Isolation Facility.  We will also set up a physical platform for interaction in the Nam Cheong District  Community Centre for “Youth Link” members. Communication with young people  will be augmented through various means, including leveraging the new mobile  application “HKYouth+” and other online media. 
118. To strengthen support for unleashing the potential of young people, the  Government will establish a new interactive space and set up a video studio at the  Youth Square. We will also launch a new round of the Funding Scheme for Youth  Life Planning Activities to sponsor NGOs in providing enhanced services and  strengthening national affairs content. The Hong Kong Jockey Club will contribute  $300 million to support these initiatives. 
119. We will continue to promote the Mainland and overseas exchange  and internship programmes and enhance the GBA Youth Employment Scheme  by relaxing eligibility requirements to allow young people aged 29 or below  with sub‑degree or higher qualifications to join the scheme, increasing the limit  of monthly allowance granted to enterprises to $12,000, and exploring reciprocal  arrangements. 
120. The Youth Employment and Training Programme will be refined and  its Chinese title renamed, with the upper age limit for participants raised to 29.  Additional workplace attachment opportunities will be provided in the GBA under  the programme.
34 
VI. Promote Integrated Development of  Culture, Sports and Tourism and Foster  Economic Diversification 
(A) East-meets-West Centre for International Cultural  Exchange and Integrated Development of Culture,  Sports and Tourism 
121. The current‑term Government set up the Culture, Sports and Tourism  Bureau (CSTB) to consolidate the integrated development of culture, the creative  industry, sports and tourism. To enhance Hong Kong’s role as the East‑meets‑West  centre for international cultural exchange, the Government strives to deepen the  institutional reform of our cultural system, improve the cultural and economic  policies, and further enhance our cultural confidence. 
Enhance Cultural Soft Power and Promote Development of Cultural  and Creative Industries 
122. The CSTB consulted the arts and cultural community last year on  the formulation of the Blueprint for Arts and Culture and Creative Industries  Development. The blueprint will cover four major development directions:  promoting the development of diverse arts and culture with an international  perspective, promoting Chinese culture, fostering arts and cultural exchange  between China and the rest of the world, and driving industry development. The  CSTB will consult the Culture Commission shortly and promulgate the blueprint  later this year. 
123. Established in June, the Cultural and Creative Industries Development  Agency adopts an industry‑oriented approach to promote the development of the  cultural and creative industries. Relevant measures include: 
(i) incubating more cultural and creative projects with potential for  industrialisation through the CreateSmart Initiative and strengthening  cross‑sectoral collaboration and leveraging market resources,  facilitating the industries to explore business opportunities; 
(ii) facilitating more registration of local and non‑local cultural  and creative products on the Asia IP Exchange Portal to foster  cross‑sectoral exchange, collaboration and business matching, and  promoting transactions and transformation of cultural IP; and
35 
(iii) making the new flagship Hong Kong Fashion Design Week an annual  signature event to develop Hong Kong into a fashion design hub in  Asia. 
Strengthen Long-term Industry Development in the West Kowloon Cultural  District 
124. The West Kowloon Cultural District (WKCD) is one of the largest arts  and cultural projects in the world. The WKCD Authority will take a leading role  in establishing an industry chain for the arts and culture and creative industries  of Hong Kong, driving cultural and creative tourism, and enhancing its financial  sustainability through diverse and innovative industrialisation measures, including: 
(i) further building Hong Kong’s strengths in arts trading – Promote  the creation of a comprehensive arts trading ecosystem, and build  storage, restoration and exhibition facilities for high‑end private art  collections; 
(ii) promoting the WKCD as a prime destination for major international  cultural, creative and commercial events – With more than 20 venues  for different kinds of mega events, the WKCD Authority will step  up efforts to host more major international cultural, creative and  commercial events, attracting more inbound visitors and stimulating  local spending; 
(iii) exporting more arts, cultural and creative projects – Organise and  curate performing arts programmes and exhibitions to be staged  as long‑run events locally, in the Mainland and overseas on a  commercial basis, and expand the sales channels for cultural and  creative merchandise; and 
(iv) branding the WKCD as a must‑visit landmark for cultural and  creative tourism – Roll out more special experience activities, and  step up worldwide promotion in collaboration with the Hong Kong  Tourism Board (HKTB) to bring in more tourists. 
Promote Sports Development and Build Hong Kong into a Centre for  Mega International Sports Events 
125. In recent years, Hong Kong athletes have achieved outstanding results  in international competitions. Hong Kong has abundant resources and support.  With our soon‑to‑complete new landmark Kai Tak Sports Park (KTSP), and our  co‑hosting of the 15th National Games with Guangdong and Macao late next  year, our city has unrivaled advantages for developing itself into a platform for 
36 
international sports activities. The Government will continue to foster sports  development by promoting sports in the community, supporting elite sports,  maintaining Hong Kong as a centre for major international sports events, enhancing  professionalism, and developing sports as an industry. Relevant measures include: 
(i) enhancing the development of elite athletes and coaches – The  Government has invited the Hong Kong Sports Institute to review the  mechanism of direct financial support for athletes (including athletes  with disabilities) to enhance the training system, and has set up a  committee to oversee the development of sports medicine and sports  science. The Government will also strengthen training for coaches,  and explore the feasibility of establishing a standardised accreditation  system for coaches; 
(ii) boosting sports promotion in the community – Provide more sports  and recreational facilities, including building a swimming complex  suitable for hosting international competitions and a sports arena with  fencing training and competition facilities. We will also regularise the  Pilot Scheme on Subvention for New Sports; 
(iii) reforming the governance of national sports associations (NSAs) –  The Sports Federation and Olympic Committee of Hong Kong,  China will conclude its review on the governance and operation of  NSAs, and make recommendations, ensuring the NSAs are operating  effectively so that athletes (including athletes with disabilities) can  realise their potential in a fair and professional environment; and 
(iv) developing a host city economy in the sports industry – The  Government will continue to support athletes to participate in  different large‑scale international competitions. We will make full use  of the KTSP and other existing venues to host large‑scale international  competitions so that Hong Kong teams can compete on home  soil, building their own audience. These will be conducive to the  long‑term development of the sports industry. 
126. The Government will review the redevelopment plan for the Hong Kong  Stadium to ensure its synergy with the KTSP. 
Develop Kai Tak Sports Park into a Sports and Mega Event Landmark 127. Opening in the first quarter of 2025, the KTSP is the largest sports  infrastructure project ever commissioned in Hong Kong. It will boost sports  development and inject impetus into related industries such as recreation,  entertainment and tourism, and also mega‑event economy.
37 
128. The inter‑departmental Task Force on KTSP, led by the Chief Secretary  for Administration, will ramp up efforts in overseeing the smooth completion  and commissioning of the KTSP and its publicity work, fostering the synergistic  development of major sports events, innovative entertainment, dining, conventions  and exhibitions, as well as tourism activities. The task force will also formulate  thorough plans and conduct comprehensive drills on security deployment, crowd  management, emergency response, and other areas. 
Enhance Cultural Confidence and Revitalise Hong Kong’s Tourism  Industry 
129. We will develop Hong Kong into a premier tourism destination through  innovative thinking and making better use of our rich and unique resources such  as the Victoria Harbour, outlying islands, rural areas, cultures, cuisines, lifestyles  and historic buildings. These elements, combined with our edges in technology,  animation and comics, the performing arts, film and television culture, and more,  will help to instill the concept of “tourism is everywhere in Hong Kong”. 
130. The CSTB will publish the Development Blueprint for Hong Kong’s  Tourism Industry 2.0 (Blueprint 2.0) later this year, with the focus on promoting  culture, sports, ecology and mega events, covering such areas as: 
(i) developing eco‑tourism – We will explore more itineraries with  characteristics related to the countryside and coastal routes,  such as island‑hopping tours in Yan Chau Tong, and enhance  related amenities; expedite the development of the South Lantau  Eco‑recreation Corridor; develop the ex‑Lamma Quarry site into  an area for resort and outdoor recreational uses; and develop Tsim  Bei Tsui and Pak Nai into eco‑tourism nodes; 
(ii) developing visitor sources from the Middle East and ASEAN – We  will actively encourage various sectors of the community to enhance  tourism‑support measures for creating a friendly environment for  visitors. They include providing information at the airport in Arabic  and encouraging taxi fleets to provide fleet service information in  Arabic; compiling a list of restaurants offering halal food; encouraging  more commercial establishments to provide appropriate facilities,  such as worship facilities in hotels; and stepping up staff training  to strengthen their knowledge on receiving visitors from different  cultural backgrounds;
38 
(iii) developing tourism products with characteristics – We will promote  yacht tourism in the expansion area of Aberdeen Typhoon Shelter,  the ex‑Lamma Quarry area and the development of the waterfront  site in the vicinity of the Hung Hom Station. We will also promote  panda tourism, horse racing tourism, and the like. The CSTB will  promote cultural and eco‑tourism itineraries and products at Sha Tau  Kok. The Security Bureau (SB) will increase the daily visitor quota  under the Sha Tau Kok opening‑up plan to 3 000 by the end of this  year. Facial recognition technology will be adopted to enable people  living or working at Chung Ying Street to enter and leave the street  unimpededly via a “contactless” mode on a pilot basis. The SB will  explore the application of relevant technology to complement the  future opening up of Chung Ying Street for tourism; 
(iv) developing mega‑event tourism economy – The Mega Events  Coordination Group, led by the Deputy Financial Secretary, will  continue to take a proactive role in attracting different mega events to  Hong Kong with emphasis on quality and quantity, boosting the retail  and hotel industries. We will drive the development of the site above  the Exhibition Station in Wan Chai North, as well as the waterfront  and pier sites in the vicinity of the Hung Hom Station, into new  landmarks providing additional event venues; 
(v) strengthening the appeal of traditional tourism – The HKTB  will draw up a gourmet guide covering the 18 districts, organise  gastronomic events, and promote gourmet food in different districts.  The CSTB will publish the action plan on the development of  cruise tourism, alongside the Blueprint 2.0, to enhance the Kai Tak  Cruise Terminal’s role as a homeport and a venue for conventions,  exhibitions and other events; and 
(vi) promoting smart tourism and enhancing service quality of the  tourism industry – The HKTB will strengthen its efforts in developing  and promoting tourism products with Hong Kong characteristics to  both locals and visitors, making use of technologies such as AI to  provide one‑stop assistance and attraction recommendations. We will  also launch a new outstanding services award scheme to consolidate  our hospitable culture.
39 
Develop New Tourist Hotspots 
131. The Government will set up a Working Group on Developing Tourist  Hotspots. Led by the Deputy Chief Secretary for Administration, it will strengthen  cross departmental co‑ordination and leverage community efforts, identifying and  developing tourist hotspots of high popularity and with strong appeal in various  districts. 
Increase Tourist Arrivals 
132. The HKSAR Government has proposed to the Central Government  further enhancements on Mainland residents’ tourism visit endorsements to  Hong Kong, including resuming the “multiple‑entry” Individual Visit Endorsements  for Shenzhen residents and expanding the coverage of pilot cities for implementing  policies on the “one trip per week” Individual Visit Endorsements. The Central  Government has advised that relevant departments are studying the expedited  implementation of the proposal proactively. 
133. To foster closer people ties with ASEAN countries, starting today, the  Government will relax the criteria for nationals of Cambodia, Laos and Myanmar  applying for multiple‑entry visas for travel and business, and extend the validity  period of multiple‑entry visas for these countries from two years to three years.  The arrangement also applies to Vietnamese, who have benefitted from the  relaxation of the visa policy since last year. Under a fast‑track arrangement, we  will expedite the processing of visa applications from group visitors of ASEAN  countries submitted via local travel agents. In addition, we will provide self‑service  immigration clearance for invited persons participating in business, development  and related activities from the 10 ASEAN countries, and provide one‑stop handling  of their applications for self‑service immigration clearance and visa through a  dedicated desk. Various bureaux will provide assistance in drawing up the list.  Effective today, the requirement for visitors to furnish an arrival or departure card  is cancelled, facilitating a faster and more convenient immigration clearance. 
(B) Foster Economic Diversification 
Support Small and Medium Enterprises 
134. To address the challenges commonly encountered by small and medium  enterprises (SMEs) during economic restructuring, the Government will introduce  the following support measures: 
(i) re‑launching the principal moratorium – Borrowing enterprises  under the SME Financing Guarantee Scheme (including the existing  loans already granted under the 80%, 90% and special 100% guarantee 
40 
products as well as new loans under the 80% and 90% guarantee  products) will be allowed to apply for principal moratorium for up  to 12 months. The maximum loan guarantee periods of the 80% and  90% guarantee products will be extended to ten years and eight years  respectively, while the partial principal repayment options will be  offered to new loans under the two guarantee products. The HKMA  is also actively considering to provide flexibility in banks’ capital  requirement to facilitate their lending to SMEs; 
(ii) injecting $1 billion into the BUD Fund – Support will be provided for  SMEs to upgrade their business operations and develop new markets  through the Dedicated Fund on Branding, Upgrading and Domestic  Sales (the BUD Fund), including expanding the geographical coverage  of E‑commerce Easy to the 10 ASEAN countries, and providing  targeted funding support for enterprises to implement green  transformation projects; 
(iii) supporting digital transformation of SMEs and capitalising on  e‑commerce opportunities – The scope of Cyberport’s Digital  Transformation Support Pilot Programme will be expanded to  cover the retail and food and beverage sectors, as well as industries  such as tourism and personal services, subsidising SMEs for digital  transformation on a one‑to‑one matching basis. The Hong Kong  Shopping Festival is to be relaunched in the next two years to help  SMEs tap into the Mainland e‑commerce sales market, and will be  held in the ASEAN market in due course; 
(iv) strengthening brand development of SMEs – The HKTDC will  formulate plans for setting up more Hong Kong Pavilions in  Mainland and overseas exhibitions to further promote Hong Kong  brands. The Trade and Industry Department and the HKTDC will  also enhance support for SMEs in developing brands and expanding  the sales network of e‑commerce; 
(v) enhancing the services of the Hong Kong Design Centre – The  organisation and functions of the Hong Kong Design Centre will  be re‑structured, so as to assist SMEs in the design industry to  enhance their services in product and brand design, and strengthen  collaboration and interface with start‑ups and Mainland enterprises  operating in Hong Kong; 
(vi) enhancing incentives for recurrent exhibitions – An additional  provision of $500 million will be allocated for launching the Incentive  Scheme for Recurrent Exhibitions 2.0, targeting new and international 
41 
exhibitions of large scale, in order to further promote mega‑event  economy and the development of the convention and exhibition  industry; 
(vii) supporting participation in government procurement – The  HKHA will refine the application procedures for admission to the  list of maintenance works contractors, providing more tendering  opportunities for contractors; and 
(viii) enhancing security of payment in the construction industry – The  Government has introduced the Construction Industry Security of  Payment Bill, which prohibits the use of unfair payment terms such  as “conditional payment” in contracts and introduces an adjudication  mechanism to resolve payment disputes. 
Develop Silver Economy 
135. Given the rapid expansion of the silver market, there is growing demand  for products and services catering to the elderly. Developing new products and  services to meet the needs of the elderly will help enhance their quality of life, and  also generate business opportunities. 
136. The Government will set up a Working Group on Promoting Silver  Economy, led by the Deputy Chief Secretary for Administration. The working  group will implement measures in five areas: 
(i) boosting “silver consumption” – We will work with all sectors to  foster elderly‑friendly consumption, and encourage incorporation of  silver economy elements into their business, for example, by offering  discounts to the elderly. Efforts will also be made to safeguard the  rights and interests of elderly consumers; 
(ii) developing the “silver industry” – We will promote marketisation and  industrialisation of products catering to the elderly by consolidating  funding resources to support product provision and market expansion  by the business sector; 
(iii) promoting “quality assurance of silver products” – We will promote  the certification of products catering to the elderly to enhance their  recognition and appeal. Standards adopted will be aligned with those  of the Mainland and overseas to facilitate sales network expansion; 
(iv) enhancing “silver financial and security arrangements” – We will  assist the elderly in making proper financial arrangements and  strengthening their financial security. Relevant measures include 
42 
promoting retirement financial planning products offered by the  Hong Kong Mortgage Corporation Limited, and providing investor  education for the elderly; and 
(v) unleashing “silver productivity” – We will help unleash the  productivity of the elderly through retraining, re‑employment and  other measures. 
Promote Sustainable Development of the Agriculture and Fisheries  Industries 
137. The Government will continue to take forward the Blueprint for the  Sustainable Development of Agriculture and Fisheries. Relevant work includes  developing deep sea mariculture at Wong Chuk Kok Hoi and Mirs Bay new  fish culture zones, conducting preparatory work for the Agricultural Park Phase  2 development, implementing urban farming strategy in NDAs, facilitating the  livestock sector to construct modernised and environmental‑friendly multi‑storey  livestock farms and promoting leisure farming and fisheries.
43 
VII. Take Forward the Northern Metropolis as  Growth Engine and Deepen GBA  
Collaboration 
(A) Take Forward Development of the Northern Metropolis 138. The Northern Metropolis is the new engine of Hong Kong’s  economic development. We will expedite the implementation of economic and  housing‑related projects in the Northern Metropolis, while maintaining a prudent  fiscal position. 
139. The Northern Metropolis will gradually enter the maturity phase. In  the next five years, some 60 000 housing units involving about 10 new PRH estates  will be completed and ready for intake. The first batch of land at the San Tin  Technopole will be put to the market, and the new Huanggang Port building with  co‑location of immigration and customs clearance arrangement will be completed.  In the second five‑year period, the number of new housing units will increase by  about 150 000, with over 10 million square metres of gross floor area available for  economic uses. The first joint‑user government building in Kwu Tung North will  be put to use, and the expanded North District Hospital will be ready for service.  As for transport infrastructure, construction of the Northern Link (NOL) Main Line  is scheduled for completion in 2034, and the Northern Metropolis Highway (San  Tin Section) is set to open in 2036. These developments will significantly boost our  economic growth and bolster our R&D and technology industries, while providing  a better living environment which will help attract talents and encourage them to  settle in Hong Kong for good. It will also enhance the quality of life of the people  of Hong Kong, improving their livelihood and well‑being. 
140. The Government will seek funding for the first‑stage of San Tin  Technopole’s infrastructure and begin construction works this year. The target is  to deliver about 20 hectares of new I&T sites in phases, beginning in 2026‑27, for  the Hong Kong Science and Technology Parks Corporation’s development and  operation. In addition, the second‑phase of the Yuen Long South NDA will begin  in mid‑2025. The preliminary development proposal for Ngau Tam Mei will be  announced shortly, with land reserved for developing the Northern Metropolis  University Town, the third medical school and an integrated teaching hospital. This  will be followed by the announcement of the preliminary development proposals  for the New Territories North New Town and the Ma Tso Lung area before end 
44 
this year. The rezoning process for Sandy Ridge in the North District will begin  this year, expanding its I&T sites to 10 hectares for use as data centres and related  purposes. 
141. We are exploring the establishment of a pilot industrial park by granting  some of the logistics sites in the Hung Shui Kiu/Ha Tsuen NDA to a company  established and led by the Government. The company will, in accordance with  the Government’s industrial policies, be responsible for formulating the park’s  development and operation strategies (including considering whether to accept  strategic investment), taking up day‑to‑day management and attracting businesses  and investment. We will announce the details in the first quarter of next year.  Separately, we will consider flexible disposal approaches for industry land to meet  the development needs of individual industries, with a view to driving industry  development. 
142. To expedite development of the Northern Metropolis, the Government  will adopt, on a pilot basis, a large‑scale land‑disposal approach, under which  sizable land parcels with commercial value and earmarked for provision of  community facilities will be selected and granted to successful bidders for collective  development. This approach can speed up development of the land parcels,  enabling a more co‑ordinated design for the area. We have identified three land  parcels, each of 10 to 20 hectares, as pilot sites. 
(B) Promote Development of the Hong Kong-Shenzhen I&T  Park in the Loop 
143. The Hetao Shenzhen‑Hong Kong Science and Technology Innovation  Co‑operation Zone, located on both sides of the Shenzhen River, consists of the  Shenzhen Park and the Hong Kong Park. Capitalising on the strengths of “One  Country, Two Systems” with the geographic advantages of “one river, two banks”,  the Government will develop the Hong Kong Park in the Loop into a world‑class,  industry‑academia‑research platform, an internationally competitive R&D  transformation and pilot production base for industries, a hub for pooling global  I&T resources, as well as a testing ground for institutional and policy innovation. 
144. I have established the Steering Committee on the Hong Kong‑Shenzhen  I&T Park in the Loop, chaired by myself, to lead the HKSAR Government to  formulate the overall strategy, planning and layout for the development of the  Hong Kong Park. The Development Outline for the Hong Kong Park of the Hetao  Shenzhen‑Hong Kong Science and Technology Innovation Co‑operation Zone  will be published later this year, setting out innovative policies to facilitate the  flow of personnel, materials, capital and data between the two parks, making the  co‑operation zone a crucial source of new quality productive forces for our country.
45 
145. The Hong Kong Park will be developed in two phases from west to east.  The Government is boosting both the speed and quantity, doubling the first‑phase  development’s gross floor area to 1 million square metres. Construction of the first  three buildings will be completed in phases, from the end of this year. The first  batch of tenants, from life and health technology, AI, data science and other pillar  industries, will begin to move in next year. The remaining five buildings will be  completed in the coming five years. 
146. We are also exploring with the Mainland authorities the trial  implementation of innovative facilitation measures, including facilitating  cross‑boundary travel of designated personnel of the two parks, enabling the  cross‑boundary movement of materials by using low‑altitude, unmanned aerial  vehicles, and facilitating cross‑boundary fund transfers by Mainland enterprises  settling in the Hong Kong Park. 
(C) Leverage the Strengths of the GBA to Foster Mutual  Capacity Development 
147. The GBA is a strategic fulcrum of the new development pattern of our  country, a demonstration zone of high‑quality development, and a pioneer of  Chinese modernisation. And Hong Kong is an active participant, facilitator and  beneficiary. 
148. To strengthen top‑level planning and steer, I have established the Steering  Group on Integration into National Development to lead the HKSAR Government  and all sectors of the community to take a more proactive role in promoting  the integrated development of Hong Kong and the Mainland, particularly the  Mainland cities of the GBA, deepening collaboration through various co‑operation  task forces between the two sides. The Government will continue to promote  the GBA development by building a higher level of connectivity, facilitating  policy innovations and breakthroughs, pursuing wider harmonisation of rules  and mechanisms, and expediting co‑ordinated development of I&T and related  industries. 
Capitalise on the Mainland’s Land Resources and Hong Kong’s  Advantages in Cargo Flow to Develop a Logistics Industry Circle 
149. The HKIA Dongguan Logistics Park is an excellent example for the  development of an innovative co‑operation mechanism. The park, built with  Hong Kong investment, combines our strengths in aviation and logistics with  the Mainland’s advantages in terms of land and manpower resources, leading to  a reduction in operating costs and cargo handling time. We will work with the  Dongguan Municipal Government to jointly develop the permanent logistics park.
46 
Promote Collaboration in the Airport Cluster of the GBA to Expand  Business Networks 
150. We will combine the strengths of the HKIA and the Zhuhai Airport,  enhancing the Fly‑Via‑Zhuhai‑Hong Kong direct passenger service and promoting  the development of the international air‑cargo business in collaboration with the  Zhuhai Municipality, to achieve mutual benefits. 
Enhance the Mechanism on Recognition of Professional Qualifications 151. In collaboration with the Guangdong Province, we have established an  evaluation mechanism of post titles for the first batch of Hong Kong engineering  professionals. We will continue to do so for other construction professions on a  gradual basis. We are also collaborating with the Guangdong Province and Macao  to create GBA Standards on the skill level for skilled workers in the construction  sector, and will work with the “One Examination, Multiple Certification”  arrangement so that those who pass the examinations adopting the GBA Standards  can concurrently obtain vocational skill certificates issued by the three places. This  will enhance the training quality of the construction industry in the GBA and  nurture talents. 
Mobilise Capital for Joint Investment in the GBA 
152. The HKIC is proactively exploring with relevant Mainland organisations  co‑operation opportunities for joint investment in GBA projects that present the  potential to realise economic and social benefits, taking into account market  developments. 
Promote Data Flow for Public Convenience and Business Facilitation 153. The Standard Contract for the Cross‑boundary Flow of Personal  Information Within the GBA (Mainland, Hong Kong), piloted in the banking, credit  referencing and healthcare sectors since last year, has been operating smoothly,  streamlining cross‑boundary data flow in compliance with relevant rules. We  will extend the measure to all sectors, promoting more cross‑boundary services to  benefit the public and businesses while facilitating data flow throughout the GBA. 
Scale up Medical Collaboration in the GBA 
154. We will extend the Elderly Health Care Voucher GBA Pilot Scheme to  cover nine Mainland cities in the GBA, and expand the sharing of cross‑boundary  medical records via the eHealth platform. We will work to enable the  cross‑boundary use of data, samples, drugs and medical devices through the GBA 
47 
Clinical Trial Collaboration Platform and the Real‑World Study and Application  Centre in the Hetao Shenzhen‑Hong Kong Science and Technology Innovation  Co‑operation Zone. That will accelerate development of the pharmaceutical  industry for medical innovation. We will also foster collaboration with the GBA to  promote specialist training that aligns with international standards. 
Strengthen Legal Co-operation 
155. We will continue to follow up on the implementation of the enhanced  arrangement for cross‑boundary service of judicial documents, and promote the  establishment of a GBA legal information platform and a dedicated platform for  GBA lawyers to facilitate professional exchange and training. 
Nurture Talents and Create Opportunities for Youth Development 156. We have been encouraging local universities to offer education services in  the GBA. To date, four GBA campuses have been set up. In addition, we have set  up the GBA Youth Employment Scheme to encourage Hong Kong youths to work  in the region. We are exploring the provision of a reciprocal arrangement.
48 
VIII. Improve People’s Livelihood in Pursuit of  Happiness 
(A) Housing: Continuously Enhance Speed, Quantity, Quality  and Efficiency 
Increase Public Housing Supply 
157. Housing is an issue of great public concern. Despite the relatively  slow pace of creating land for housing development in the past, the problem  of back‑loaded public housing supply has started to turn around through the  unremitting efforts of the Government. While we have identified land for providing  sufficient public housing units to meet the long‑term demand and enhanced the  speed as well as efficiency of housing development, land creation and housing  construction take time. To bridge the short‑term supply gaps in these few years,  I announced in 2022 the introduction of the innovative LPH with the provision of  30 000 units, in order to reduce the Composite Waiting Time for Subsidised Rental  Housing (CWT). 
158. This measure has been bearing fruit. Coupled with LPH, the total  public housing supply in the coming five years (2025‑26 to 2029‑30) will reach  189 000 units, which is about 80% higher than that of the first five‑year period since  the current‑term Government took office (2022‑23 to 2026‑27). In the past two years,  the average waiting time for PRH dropped by half a year, from the peak of 6.1 years  to the current 5.5 years. Following the gradual completion of LPH next year, the  CWT could be shortened by one and a half years to 4.5 years in 2026‑27. 
159. I am eager to house PRH applicants as early as possible. The Advance  Allocation Scheme I proposed when I took office has so far helped more than  2 000 families move in their flats five to nine months in advance, saving nearly  $50 million of rental expenditure on the part of the beneficiaries. By 2027‑28, about  10 000 additional units will be completed, enabling PRH applicants to move in  earlier than originally anticipated. 
160. In addition, the first batch of some 2 100 LPH units, located on Yau Pok  Road, Yuen Long, will be completed for intake in the first quarter of next year. We  expect to complete a total of about 9 500 units next year, moving towards the target  of completing about 30 000 units by 2027‑28.
49 
Devise a System on the Renting of Subdivided Units in Residential  Buildings to Tackle the Issue 
161. The Task Force on Tackling the Issue of SDUs has already submitted  a report. The Government has decided to put in place, through legislation, a  system on the renting of SDUs in residential buildings. SDUs meeting the required  standards will be named as Basic Housing Units. 
162. Current SDUs differ significantly in their conditions regarding fire safety,  ventilation, floor area, availability of individual kitchens and toilets and whether  they are separated or combined, among others. As such, it is necessary to set  minimum standards to eradicate inadequate SDUs. At present, there are some  110 000 households living in SDUs, indicating a genuine demand for these units.  As the aggregate rent received from several units subdivided from a single flat is  much higher than the rent of one whole flat without subdivision, it gives owners  a strong financial incentive to operate rental SDUs. Under appropriate regulation,  the market demand for SDUs will be satisfied by Basic Housing Units that meet the  required standards. 
163. Substandard SDUs in residential buildings must be converted into  Basic Housing Units that meet the required standards. Upon conversion, these  units must be confirmed by professionals their compliance with the required  standards and apply for recognition. Otherwise, there would be criminal liability  on the part of owners to rent out substandard SDUs, while the tenants concerned  will not be held liable. We will allow time for owners of existing SDUs in  residential buildings to carry out the necessary works. A grace period will be  prescribed by law, during which enforcement actions will not be taken against the  illegal renting of substandard SDUs. To this end, the Government will set up a  registration system, enabling registered owners to be entitled to the grace period.  The registration system only accepts applications from owners of pre‑existing  SDUs in residential buildings under rental. New SDUs entering the market must  apply for recognition as up‑to‑standard Basic Housing Units before renting out,  hence no grace period is needed for their conversion. Given that only new SDUs  recognised as up‑to‑standard Basic Housing Units are allowed to be rented out, and  that pre‑existing registered SDUs must be converted into Basic Housing Units in  conformity with the required standards or they will face orderly eradication if the  owners concerned continue to rent out substandard SDUs illegally after the grace  period, the number of substandard SDUs in residential buildings will gradually go  down to zero. 
164. The Government will allow an adequate grace period for pre‑existing  SDU owners and households to make necessary arrangements, and handle SDUs in  residential buildings by batches in an orderly manner having regard to the market 
50 
supply of Basic Housing Units and taking into consideration the supply of and  policy on public housing. The Secretary for Housing will be empowered by law to  decide, upon expiry of the grace period, when to take enforcement actions against  substandard SDUs by batches in an orderly manner in light of actual circumstances. 
165. The Government proposes that the standards of “Basic Housing Units”  should include the provision of windows, an individual toilet, a floor area of no  less than 8 square metres, etc. The Deputy Financial Secretary and the Secretary  for Housing, being the head and deputy head of the Task Force respectively,  will announce the details and seek the views of the LegCo and stakeholders for  drawing up the legislative proposals and related measures, such as the timetable for  registration. 
Enhance the Housing Ladder 
166. The HKHA will further enhance the housing ladder in addressing the  aspiration of the public for home ownership, including: 
(i) adjusting the ratio between PRH (including Green Form Subsidised  Home Ownership Scheme (GSH) units) and subsidised sale flats  (SSF) – The HKHA is reviewing public housing projects to be completed  in the middle or near the end of the next decade, with an aim to  gradually adjust the ratio between PRH and SSF from the current 7:3 to  6:4; 
(ii) increasing the chance of applicants who have made repeated  attempts to purchase SSF – Starting from the next GSH and HOS sale  exercises, an extra ballot number will be allocated to applicants who  failed to purchase a SSF in the last two consecutive sale exercises of the  same type of SSF; and 
(iii) expediting the circulation of PRH units – The HKHA will tighten  up the Well‑off Tenants Policies by raising the additional rent and  lowering the income limits for well‑off tenants, so that public resources  are appropriately allocated to applicants in need. Meanwhile, the ratio  between Green Form and White Form in respect of HOS flats will be  revised from 4:6 to 5:5 to encourage more PRH tenants to buy HOS  flats. 
Combat Public Rental Housing Tenancy Abuse 
167. In recent years, the HKHA has been strengthening its efforts to combat  PRH tenancy abuse. The number of PRH flats recovered by the HKHA due to  tenancy abuse and breach of tenancy agreement or housing policies over the last 
51 
two years adds up to 5 000, equivalent to building a medium‑sized housing estate.  The results are prominent. The HKHA will launch the “Cherish Public Housing  Resources Award Scheme” in January next year to offer rewards to persons who  provide concrete intelligence that leads to identification of substantiated tenancy  abuse of PRH. 
Take Forward Public Rental Housing Redevelopment 
168. The HKHA is proceeding with 11  redevelopment projects. We will  announce the findings and details of the study on the redevelopment of Choi Hung  Estate later this year, and release the redevelopment plans for Sai Wan Estate and  Ma Tau Wai Estate next year. 
Stabilise the Supply of Spade-ready Sites for Private Housing 169. According to the Long Term Housing Strategy, the supply target  for private housing in the coming decade is projected to be 132 000 units. The  Government will make available land over the next five years to provide about  80 000 private housing units. 
Relax the Maximum Loan-to-Value Ratios of Property Mortgage Loans 170. Taking into account the latest economic and financial environment and  on the basis that the stability of the banking system is maintained, the HKMA  will adjust the maximum loan‑to‑value ratio for residential properties to 70%,  regardless of the value of the properties, whether the properties are for self‑use or  held by companies, and whether the purchasers are first‑time home buyers, while  the maximum debt servicing ratio will be adjusted to 50%. For non‑residential  properties, the maximum loan‑to‑value ratio and maximum debt servicing ratio will  be adjusted to the respective same levels. 
Further Improve Building Safety and Building Management 171. Through the Building Management Professional Advisory Service  Scheme, the Home Affairs Department assisted in the formation of about 100 owners’  corporations in the past two years in nine districts with more “three‑nil” buildings.  The scheme has been expanded to cover all districts across the city in mid‑2024,  with the contract period extended to three years.
52 
172. Next year, the Government will implement a pilot scheme on “joint  property management” in selected areas, under which the same property  management company will be engaged to provide joint management services for  aged building clusters in the vicinity, enabling “three‑nil” and aged buildings to  have access to basic property management services at affordable fees. 
173. To enhance deterrence against failure to comply with notices or orders  by required time and against the erection of large‑scale unauthorised building  works (UBWs), the Government will put forth proposals to amend the Buildings  Ordinance and launch a public consultation later this year. Among other things,  we will propose increasing the types of exempted works and minor works under  the Buildings Ordinance, so as to handle minor illegal structures of lower risks  in a pragmatic manner. The relevant legislative amendment proposals will be  introduced in 2026. 
174. To foster an elderly‑friendly building environment, the Government will  put forward a series of proposals on elderly‑friendly building design for phased  implementation. 
(B) Create Land to Build More Housing 
175. The Government remains determined to sustain efforts in land  production. We will assess the situation and take forward various projects in  a steady and paced manner. According to the latest forecast, the supply of  developable land, i.e. spade‑ready sites, from Government‑led projects will reach  about 3 000 hectares in the next decade. The Government will take into account  the latest market changes when disposing land, ensuring a stable and healthy  development of the market. 
Cut More Red Tapes and Lower Costs 
176. The Government is making vigorous efforts in streamlining land  development procedures. We have promulgated an internal circular, expressly  stating that all approving departments are required to take a facilitating role and  strive to streamline the relevant procedures when processing applications. The  initiative is well‑received by the industry. We will continue to cut red tapes and  streamline procedures. Relevant measures include: 
(i) leveraging industry resources to enhance speed and efficiency – We  will outsource drone inspections of external walls of buildings and  UBWs as well as associated analyses, to private companies. We will  also engage professionals to handle the vetting work of small‑scale or  temporary structures through self‑certification;
53 
(ii) reducing construction costs – We will strengthen the role of the  Project Strategy and Governance Office under the DEVB to complete  a strategic study on construction costs by the end of this year and  propose improvement measures such as increasing direct procurement  of construction materials and products by the Government, reviewing  the building design standards, and facilitating local application  of cost‑effective construction materials and technologies from the  Mainland and overseas; and 
(iii) expanding project co‑ordination – We will expand the purview  of the Development Projects Facilitation Office under the DEVB to  facilitate co‑ordination with departments in expediting the approval  of land use and related matters for the development of I&T and  other industries in the Northern Metropolis, in addition to vetting of  large‑scale private residential and commercial developments. 
Facilitate R&D and Application of Construction Technologies and  Align Hong Kong Standards with Guobiao 
177. The DEVB established the Building Technology Research Institute (BTRi)  this August. Apart from conducting R&D on innovative materials, construction  methods and technologies, the BTRi also devises standards, conducts testing  and provides accreditation to spearhead innovation in the industry. A Modular  Integrated Construction (MiC) Manufacturer Certification Scheme will also be  launched in synergy with production bases in the Mainland, so as to leverage the  complementarity of the construction industries in Guangdong and Hong Kong. 
178. We will also review and enhance Hong Kong’s building standards,  which have been in place for many years, through the BTRi by making reference  to overseas building standards and Guobiao (GB), with a view to promoting local  application of high‑quality and cost‑effective construction materials from the  Mainland and overseas. Moreover, when high‑quality GB construction materials  and technologies are applied locally, it will also be beneficial for GB to explore  international markets. We will also closely liaise with our counterparts in the  Guangdong Province to take forward the formulation of the GBA Construction  Standards. 
179. The HKHA will make wider use of MiC 2.0, the second generation MiC  approach jointly developed with research institutions, and streamline the on‑site  installation procedures to safeguard construction safety. Tender documents will also  expressly state the works procedures permissible for the use of construction robotics  to enhance site safety and construction efficiency.
54 
Commence the Environmental Impact Assessment Process for Kau Yi  Chau Artificial Islands 
180. The Government will take forward the Kau Yi Chau Artificial Islands  project in a steady and prudent manner. We will commence the statutory  environmental impact assessment (EIA) process for the reclamation works under  the project by the end of this year. The target is to complete the relevant approval  procedures next year. The related detailed engineering design will commence later  this year. 
Expedite Urban Redevelopment 
181. The Urban Renewal Authority is conducting planning studies for Tsuen  Wan and Sham Shui Po, and will submit renewal master plans in the second half of  next year. Meanwhile, the DEVB is examining the use of newly developed land to  drive large‑scale urban redevelopment projects, including the cross‑district transfer  of plot ratios and the construction of more dedicated rehousing estates, etc. The  target is to formulate proposals in the first half of next year. 
182. To continue encouraging redevelopment and conversion of aged  industrial buildings, we will extend an array of measures, which are expiring  soon under the revitalisation scheme for industrial buildings, to the end of 2027,  continuing to allow an increase in plot ratio of up to 20% for industrial building  redevelopment projects. 
(C) Take Forward the Construction of Transport Infrastructure 
Promote Major Transport Infrastructure Development 183. The Government is actively following through the Major Transport  Infrastructure Development Blueprint for Hong Kong, under which the Hung  Shui Kiu Station and the NOL Main Line are to commence construction this year  and next year for tentative completion in 2030 and 2034 respectively. In parallel,  cross‑boundary railway projects are pressed ahead at full speed, including the  Hong Kong‑Shenzhen Western Rail Link (Hung Shui Kiu‑Qianhai) and the NOL  Spur Line, to enhance linkage between Hong Kong and Shenzhen. 
Build Smart and Green Mass Transit Systems 
184. Devoted to take forward the three smart and green mass transit systems,  and for compressing the time required for construction, we invited suppliers and  operators to submit expressions of interest for the East Kowloon and Kai Tak  projects this August. We will invite expressions of interest for the Hung Shui Kiu/
55 
Ha Tsuen projects later this year. Through innovative implementation mode and  construction methods, we aim to complete the Kai Tak project three years ahead of  the original target completion date. 
(D) Deepen Reform of the Healthcare System 
185. To enhance the health of the people of Hong Kong, improve healthcare  protection and quality, and capitalise on our healthcare professions’ strengths, the  Government will conduct a comprehensive review on the positioning and objectives  of the healthcare system. The review will cover the following areas: reforming the  functions and division of work among the Hospital Authority (HA), the Department  of Health (DH) and the Primary Healthcare Commission (PHC  Commission),  strengthening health promotion and disease prevention in primary healthcare, and  improving public healthcare services. In parallel, we will reform private healthcare  services in terms of their quality, cost‑effectiveness and price transparency, providing  the public with high quality, cost‑effective and affordable healthcare service options.  We will also support manpower training and technology innovation, helping to  uphold the global standing and regional advantage of Hong Kong’s healthcare  professions. This will also be conducive to the development of Hong Kong into  an international health and medical innovation hub, an advanced medical service  centre in Asia, a place where medical professionals cluster, as well as a bridge for  East‑and‑West healthcare exchanges. 
Advance Primary Healthcare Development 
186. The Government will promote the development of primary healthcare on  all fronts, including: 
(i) formulating legislation to strengthen the regulatory framework of  primary healthcare and authorise the PHC Commission to set up  quality assurance and monitoring mechanisms; 
(ii) developing a community drug formulary and launching a community  pharmacy programme to help the public obtain affordable,  primary‑healthcare drugs through central purchasing and the  community network; 
(iii) devising health promotion strategies by adopting a life‑course  framework to formulate health management plans for the public  according to age and health conditions; 
(iv) revamping maternal and child health and family‑planning services  to strengthen pre‑pregnancy counselling and parental education and  promote healthy fertility;
56 
(v) strengthening the Whole School Health Programme to recommend  targeted school‑based measures for physical activities, meals and  other matters for each school to improve students’ physical and  psychological well‑being; 
(vi) upgrading more District Health Centre Expresses into District Health  Centres (DHCs), and expanding the service network, and integrating  the services of Woman Health Centres and Elderly Health Centres; 
(vii) expanding the Chronic Disease Co‑Care Pilot Scheme to cover blood  lipid testing; positioning the HA’s general out‑patient services as  the comprehensive, primary healthcare service providers for the  underprivileged; 
(viii) formulating risk‑based screening programmes for prevalent cancers  on a gradual basis, including breast cancer screening, exploring the  use of AI to assist lung cancer screening, and implementing hepatitis  B screening to prevent liver cancer; 
(ix) launching a Primary Dental Co‑Care Pilot Scheme for Adolescents  to encourage the prevention of dental diseases, as well as a  Community Dental Support Programme to enhance dental services  for underprivileged groups. This would include elderly persons  in financial hardship, replacing the Community Care Fund Elderly  Dental Assistance Programme, and introducing preventive dental  services for pre‑school children; and 
(x) continuing efforts in tobacco control. 
Enhance Public and Private Healthcare Services 
187. The Government will strengthen the HA’s public healthcare services,  including: 
(i) reviewing the structure and levels of the HA’s fees and charges to  encourage prudent use of services and direct resources to patients  who need them most and for those with serious or critical conditions,  while increasing support for patients with financial difficulties and  strengthening the financial sustainability of the targeted subsidisation  of public healthcare services;
57 
(ii) strengthening the centralised procurement of drugs and medical  devices by various clusters of the HA system in order to enhance  their bargaining power and to expedite, in a more proactive manner,  the introduction of new drugs, meeting efficacy and cost‑effectiveness  standards to the Drug Formulary; 
(iii) formulating a directory for inherited and rare diseases by using the  Hong Kong Genome Institute’s genomic data, thereby facilitating  early diagnosis and treatment by clinical teams, while supporting  relevant research and clinical trials to promote precision medicine; 
(iv) fully integrating the paediatric services of various clusters at  Hong Kong Children’s Hospital and developing more advanced  healthcare services to make the best use of the Children’s Hospital; 
(v) finalising the projects and timetable of the Second Hospital  Development Plan to dovetail with the development of the Northern  Metropolis and to address the needs of local districts; 
(vi) setting up, in accordance with national accreditation standards, the  first stroke centre and the second chest pain centre; 
(vii) enhancing the triage system and referral arrangements for specialist  out‑patient services, including setting up inter‑specialty, integrated,  out‑patient clinics to avoid the need for multiple referrals; and 
(viii) increasing the service capacity for cataract surgeries by at least 20%. 188. The Government will also enhance the quality and efficiency of  healthcare services, including: 
(i) establishing a professional platform for developing evidence‑based  clinical protocols and exploring the feasibility of devising service  quality and efficiency standards for public and private healthcare  sectors; 
(ii) developing quality indicators for public and private healthcare  systems and exploring legislating for private healthcare price  transparency to enhance service efficiency and address the issue of  medical inflation, with the plan to consult the healthcare sector next  year; and 
(iii) amending relevant legislation to require all healthcare providers to  deposit essential health data in the personal eHealth accounts of  members of the public, enabling the latter to have more complete  electronic health records and enhance continuity of medical care.
58 
Bring in More Healthcare Professionals 
189. We will promote the use of the legislation passed earlier to proactively  admit more non‑local doctors, nurses and dentists to enhance manpower. The  Government will introduce a bill on the admission of qualified non‑locally trained  supplementary medical professionals next year. 
Support Establishment of a Third Medical School 
190. In addition to increasing training places of the existing two medical  schools, the Government supports the plan, by local universities, to establish a  third medical school, increasing the number of doctors and supporting the city’s  development as an international health‑ and medical‑innovation hub. A task group  will be set up, inviting universities interested in establishing the new medical  school to submit proposals. The Government will set aside sites in the Northern  Metropolis Ngau Tam Mei to develop the new medical school campus and build an  integrated medical teaching and research hospital. 
Promote Development of Chinese Medicine 
191. To develop Hong Kong into a bridgehead for the internationalisation of  Chinese medicine (CM), the Government will make use of Hong Kong’s advantages  in its healthcare system, regulatory regime, standard‑setting, clinical research and  trade, and other areas. We will publish the CM Development Blueprint next year,  and take forward the following measures: 
(i) exploring the application of big data to foster international research  collaboration on herb‑drug interaction to discover more evidence of  clinical significance, promoting the internationalisation of CM; 
(ii) expanding integrated Chinese‑Western medicine services to cover  more diseases in which CM has an advantage, including respiratory  diseases and knee osteoarthritis, and to progressively extend the  cancer care programme to all hospital clusters; 
(iii) rolling out the first Chinese Medicine Hospital and the permanent  premises of the Government Chinese Medicines Testing Institute,  which are expected to be completed and begin phased operation next  year; and 
(iv) organising the first edition of the Hong Kong Chinese Medicine  Cultural Festival to promote the culture of CM in collaboration with  the industry.
59 
Promote Mental Health 
192. The Government will extend integrated services based on a medical‑ educational‑social collaboration model to promote mental health. Relevant  measures include: 
(i) formulating a stepped care model for mental health – We will  develop a multi‑disciplinary framework with tiers, from dealing with  general emotional problems in the frontline to handling cases requiring  follow‑up and more serious mental illnesses cases. The framework  sets out the roles of different professionals (such as teaching staff,  social workers and healthcare workers) and their division of work in  the provision of mental health services for cases in each tier, enabling  them to work together and perform their respective roles smoothly; 
(ii) raising community awareness of mental health – An annual  promotional theme will be set for the Mental Health Workplace  Charter, and recognition will be given to participating organisations  for achieving targets. We will also promote the 4Rs Mental Health  Charter in schools to promote the mental health of students, teaching  staff and parents in a more holistic manner; 
(iii) enhancing support for children and adolescents – We will extend  and enhance the Three‑Tier School‑based Emergency Mechanism,  and launch the “Mental Health Literacy” resource packages for  senior secondary and lower primary levels. A real‑time, online  youth‑emotional‑support platform will be set up in the second  quarter of next year; 
(iv) facilitating the integration of persons in mental recovery into the  community – We will set up Transitional Support Service Teams for  Persons in Mental Recovery, offering support to discharged patients  waitlisted for halfway house service. The Social Welfare Department  (SWD) will also set up an additional Integrated Community Centre  for Mental Wellness; and 
(v) strengthening teacher training and parent education – We will  strengthen teachers’ capacity in the early identification of, and  support for, students with mental health needs, and assist parents in  acquiring the knowledge and skills in addressing children’s mental  health.
60 
(E) Build a Caring and Inclusive Society 
193. I attach great importance to building a harmonious and stable  community, one that is caring and inclusive, providing targeted assistance to the  underprivileged and families in need. Social welfare tops public expenditures of  all policy portfolios, with more than $300 million spent on social welfare each day.  This underlines the Government’s emphasis on social welfare. 
Targeted Poverty Alleviation 
194. The Government has adopted the strategy of targeted poverty alleviation  by directing resources to those most in need. This approach is well‑received by the  community. We will focus on the following key areas: 
(i) expanding the Strive and Rise Programme – We will launch the  third cohort of the programme this year to recruit 4 000 mentees. We  will also encourage youth leaders of the Alumni Club to organise  activities for self‑development, enhance training for mentors and  related initiatives; 
(ii) extending the Pilot Programme on Community Living Room  (CLR) – We will set up three additional CLRs next year in areas  clustered with SDUs. They are expected to benefit about 1 300 target  households, serving about 200 000 attendances a year. Including the  four CLRs already launched, they are expected to serve about 3 050  SDU households, drawing about 470 000 attendances a year; 
(iii) enhancing the School‑based After‑School Care Service  Scheme – Beginning this school year, the number of primary schools  covered by the Scheme will increase from 50 to over 110, enabling  students in need to stay at school outside school hours for care and  learning support, allowing their parents to take up jobs. Subject to  actual utilisation and outcome of the scheme, we plan to encourage  more schools to participate in the scheme, without capping the  number of places, in the 2025/26 school year; and 
(iv) subsidising elderly recipients of the Comprehensive Social Security  Assistance (CSSA) to reside in residential care homes for the elderly  (RCHEs) in the Guangdong Province – We will launch a three‑year  pilot scheme next year to subsidise elderly CSSA recipients retiring  in Guangdong to reside in designated RCHEs in the Guangdong  Province. Each eligible elderly person will receive a monthly subsidy  of $5,000, subject to a quota of 1 000.
61 
Care for the Elderly 
195. The Government attaches great importance to caring for the elderly in  need and has been constantly strengthening elderly services. The total number of  vouchers under the Residential Care Service Voucher Scheme for the Elderly will  be increased by 20% to 6 000, allowing more frail elderly persons to be admitted to  RCHEs of their choice and receive subsidised care services without waiting. 
196. We will enhance the Residential Care Services Scheme in Guangdong to  provide more choices and support for elderly persons who opt to stay in RCHEs in  the province. Relevant measures include: 
(i) increasing the number of participating RCHEs from the existing 4 to 11  in November 2024; 
(ii) sharing part of the elderly participants’ medical expenses in  Guangdong; and 
(iii) engaging organisations to provide care services for participating  elderly persons to help them adapt to living in Guangdong. 
197. We are providing, through the Special Scheme to Import Care Workers  for RCHs, additional manpower support for local residential care homes (RCHs)  and enhancing their staff quality. We are also conducting a holistic review of the  skill and qualification requirements of RCH staff providing health and rehabilitation  services, including the creation of promotion ranks for incumbent health workers  and the relaxation of the academic qualification for the Certificate in Progression  Training for Care Workers programme. The review is expected to be completed by  the end of this year. 
198. The Government is also discussing with the banking sector possible ways  to enable Hong Kong elderly persons retiring in Guangdong and Fujian Provinces  to receive portable cash assistance from the Government more conveniently through  banks. 
Support Carers 
199. The Government is committed to supporting carers. In addition to  providing carers’ allowance, respite services, a one‑stop information gateway and  the 24‑hour Designated Hotline for Carer Support 182 183, we launched the District  Services and Community Care Teams – Pilot Scheme on Supporting Elderly and  Carers in Tsuen Wan and Southern District this March. Trained by the SWD, Care  Teams of the two districts identify and reach out to households in need, and provide  support to the elderly and carers who seek help from the Designated Hotline. The 
62 
scheme has achieved good results. In the past six months, the Care Teams visited  4 700 families and referred about 900 cases to social welfare organisations for  follow‑up. Next year, we will extend the scheme to across the territory, supporting  elderly persons and carers in all 18 districts. 
200. We will also explore the setting up of an inter‑disciplinary and  inter‑organisation database. It will cover carers of elderly persons and carers of  persons with disabilities (PWDs) and the use of identification tools designed by  university teams for the detection of high‑risk cases and early intervention and  support. 
Strengthen Support for Persons with Disabilities 
201. We will further enhance the rehabilitation services for PWDs, including: 
(i) establishing 14 Integrated Community Rehabilitation Centres across  the city with the provision of 1 280  additional service places, to  support PWDs based on their individual needs and rehabilitation  progress through an integrated, case‑management approach; 
(ii) creating 90 additional peer‑support posts to enhance peer assistance  for PWDs and their carers; 
(iii) setting up an additional District Support Centre for PWDs in New  Territories East; and 
(iv) providing about 1 040  additional places for day, residential and  pre‑school rehabilitation services, and exploring the establishment of  Special Child Care Centres on vacant kindergarten premises. 
202. To encourage and support PWDs to engage in employment, the  Government will introduce the “Caring Employer” medal, commending employers  who actively engage PWDs; promote the establishment of more social enterprises  engaging PWDs; and enhance the services and training models of sheltered  workshops and integrated vocational rehabilitation services centres, building a  better vocational rehabilitation and training ladder for PWDs. 
Promote Women’s Development 
203. There are many women in Hong Kong playing leading roles. To promote  women’s workplace development, we will establish a network run by leading  women from all walks of life and launch a mentorship programme “She Inspires”.  Under the programme, female university students will be paired with mentors from  the senior management of different sectors.
63 
Support Working Parents 
204. To support working parents, I announced the setting up of 10 aided,  standalone, child care centres last year. The Government will set up one more child  care centre providing 100 additional places for day child care services. Service  places under the Neighbourhood Support Child Care Project will be increased by  25%, to 2 500, with the estimated number of beneficiaries increasing to 25 000. 
Protect Children 
205. The LegCo has enacted the Mandatory Reporting of Child Abuse  Ordinance to require professionals in the social welfare, education and healthcare  sectors to report serious child‑abuse cases. To strengthen parental education, the  SWD will launch a pilot scheme to set up four Community Parents and Children  Centres to promote parent‑child interaction and pass on positive‑parenting skills to  parents through play‑based services, supporting families in need. 
Provide Support for Ethnic Minorities 
206. To help ethnic minorities (EMs) better integrate into the community,  I announced the setting up of two additional support‑service centres for EMs last  year, which will begin operation by the end of this year. The Government will  engage one more support service centre to provide interpretation and translation  services for EMs next year, reducing language barrier concerns. The EDB will  strengthen Chinese learning support and parental assistance for non‑Chinese  speaking (NCS) students (including EM students), providing after‑school  Chinese‑language courses, enhancing the Online Chinese Language Self‑learning  Resources and organising cross‑school, teacher‑learning communities. The EDB will  also provide parental education activities for the parents of NCS children. 
Care Teams 
207. Care Teams are the Government’s key service teams under the  improved district governance structure. Fully launched across the city last year,  all 452 Care Teams have been working diligently and providing a wide range of  caring and support services for the community. To date, they have visited about  230 000 elderly households and other households in need, and provided over  22 000 counts of simple household care or other support services. Their service  have been well‑received by the public. The Government will regularise the funding  provision for Care Teams and increase funding by 50% in the next term of service in  support of their work.
64 
(F) Strengthen Labour Support 
Reform the Employees Retraining Board and Vigorously Strengthen  the Training of Local Workers 
208. In the last Policy Address, I announced a comprehensive review on  the Employees Retraining Board (ERB), which has been completed. I accept the  recommendations on reforming the ERB, enhancing its role and positioning, from  providing employment‑related training targeted at low‑skilled workers to devising  skills‑based training programmes and strategies for the entire workforce. In face  of intense market competition, rapid industry development and widespread use  of technology application, it is particularly important for the workforce to engage  in life‑time learning and acquire new skills. Near‑term reform measures include,  from early next year, removing from the eligibility criteria the cap on education  level of service recipients, and increasing the annual number of training places by  at least 15 000, targeting at the entire workforce; strengthening collaboration with  higher education institutions and leading enterprises; as well as enhancing the  ERB’s career planning and job‑matching services for service recipients. In addition,  the ERB will map out other medium to long‑term measures, such as how it could  gauge and anticipate future skill requirements, how to reposition itself and build  a new branding, how its structure and staff be adjusted, and how the Employees  Retraining Ordinance should be amended. The ERB will work out the details and  timetable, with proposals expected by the end of next year. 
209. To support vocational training for local workers, the Government will  put up two vacant school premises for application by established and experienced  trade unions for providing training courses for different industries (particularly  construction industry). 
Implement Full Portability of the Mandatory Provident Fund 210. The Mandatory Provident Fund Schemes Authority will work out the  details for implementing the “Full Portability” proposal, under which employees  will be able to, making use of the eMPF Platform launched in June, transfer the  accrued benefits derived from their employers’ mandatory contributions to a  scheme at their choice. This will help encourage the employees to proactively  manage their Mandatory Provident Fund (MPF) investments, promote market  competition, and create room for fee reductions.
65 
Enhance the Protection of Wages on Insolvency Fund and Protect  Employees 
211. The Government will take forward various measures to enhance  employee protection, including: 
(i) abolishing the arrangement of using the accrued benefits of  employers’ mandatory contributions under the MPF System to offset  severance payment and long service payment on 1 May next year.  The Government will launch a 25‑year subsidy scheme exceeding  $33 billion to share out employers’ expenses upon the abolition of the  offsetting arrangement; 
(ii) reviewing the coverage of ex‑gratia severance payments under the  Protection of Wages on Insolvency Fund, and exploring an increase in  the ceiling of ex‑gratia payments to enhance employee protection; 
(iii) implementing the new annual review mechanism of the Statutory  Minimum Wage; and 
(iv) amending the continuous contract requirement under the  Employment Ordinance by relaxing the threshold from working 18  hours in a week for four consecutive weeks (i.e. 72 hours in total)  to an aggregate of 68 hours in four weeks, making it easier for  employees to enjoy comprehensive employment rights. 
Encourage Employment among Middle-aged and Elderly Persons 212. The three‑year Re‑employment Allowance Pilot Scheme was launched  in July, with more than 20 000 participants to date. The Labour Department will  continue the scheme and, through the Good Employer Charter 2024, encourage  employers to adopt family‑friendly employment practices such as flexible work  arrangements. 
Promote Occupational Safety and Health 
213. The Government has been encouraging the industry to provide a safer  working environment. Among other things, it mandated, in July, the adoption of  the Smart Site Safety System (4S) for mobile plants in designated private‑building  works, and issued the first batch of 4S labelling. We will strengthen the protection  of workers’ safety under a three‑pronged approach, formulating safety guidelines,  promoting optimal use of robotic technology and enhancing industry training.
66 
(G) Promote a Green and Low-carbon Lifestyle 
Continue to Promote Waste Reduction and Recycling 
214. The Government will continue to promote waste reduction and recycling. Initiatives include reinforcing publicity and education on waste reduction and recycling in the community and schools; expanding the community recycling network by increasing public collection points from about 500 at present to 800; optimising service hours of the GREEN@COMMUNITY recycling facilities to provide better service; setting up self‑service recycling stores or smart recycling facilities in PRH estates; doubling the number of residential food waste collection facilities across the city; as well as reviewing the tender arrangements and requirements for GREEN@COMMUNITY facilities to enhance cost‑effectiveness and improve service quality. I·PARK 1, the first waste‑to‑energy facility for treating municipal solid waste, is expected to begin operation next year. We will also take forward the construction of I·PARK 2, working towards the goal of “zero landfill”. The Government will continue to assess public views on, and participation in, waste reduction, and report to the LegCo by mid‑2025. 
215. The Government will establish a common legislative framework for the producer responsibility schemes applicable to different products, facilitating the future inclusion of such products as plastic beverage containers and beverage cartons progressively, expanding our waste‑to‑resources capacities.  
Speed up Green Transformation of Manufacturing Production 216. The Government has been supporting local development of green technology through the Green Tech Fund and the Innovation and Technology Fund, transforming R&D projects with application potential into commercially valuable technologies or products and facilitating their production locally. The Environment and Ecology Bureau (EEB) is assisting two local companies in setting up production lines to upcycle local waste materials into high‑value products, namely core materials for electricity‑free cooling products and acoustic metamaterial products, promoting development of Hong Kong’s green industry. 
217. The EEB has extended the usable area and lease terms of about 20 short‑term tenancy sites currently designated for recycling operation in Hong Kong, giving the recycling industry more room for further development and upgrading.
67 
218. The Government will inject $100 million for a new round of the Cleaner  Production Partnership Programme to expedite green transformation, renovation  and the upgrading of local factories and Hong Kong‑owned factories in the  Guangdong Province, bringing Hong Kong closer to its carbon‑neutrality targets. 
Continue to Promote Ecological Conservation 
219. The Government will continue to enhance the facilities of our country  parks, integrating cultural characteristics of villages, to provide better eco‑tourism  experience for the public and visitors. It will also continue to develop the Sam Po  Shue Wetland Conservation Park. 
Expand the Charging Network for Electric Vehicles 
220. The Government has stepped up efforts to promote green transport.  Through the EV‑charging at Home Subsidy Scheme and the gross floor area  concession arrangement, about 200 000 EV‑charging parking spaces are expected  to be available by mid‑2027. The Government will earmark $300 million for a  new scheme, providing subsidies to the private sector for installing quick‑charging  facilities. The target is to have a total of 3 000 quick chargers installed by 2030. 
221. The Government granted two vacant petrol‑filling station sites for  conversion into quick‑charging stations earlier this year. It plans to invite  expressions of interest from the industry next year to repurpose existing  petrol‑filling station sites as charging stations, with topside development for other  purposes under the “single site, multiple use” model.
68 
IX. Closing Remarks 
222. Since taking up office, I have pushed ahead with many reform measures  to transform government culture, strengthen the systems and improved various  regimes. Our goal is to keep Hong Kong going, and make it a city in which people  live in better homes, enjoy better education and cherish their lives. We strive for  this goal. 
223. I always take time to reflect and listen to views of others to ensure that  our policies are working and our measures are effective. I take a close look into  the daily needs of our people while staying abreast from a global perspective of  the world trend, our nation’s strategic outlook and the societal interests. While  keeping our principles and being innovative when taking forward reforms, we have  to look at the flip sides that a measure may bring other than its benefits. Reform  is essential, but we should always be mindful that it is a means and not an end,  that it should never undermine success factors that are well established and work  effectively. 
224. Having regard to various objective facts, I do believe that our overall  policy directions are on the right course. Over the past two years or so, median  monthly household income has risen by about $2,800, up over 10%, while over  100 000 jobs have been added. The waiting time for public housing has been  shortened by six months, and the first batch of LPH will soon be completed for  intake, filling the gap in the supply of public housing. District governance and Care  Team services are firmly in place in all 18 districts across the territory. Outcomes of  our efforts to trawl for talents and enterprises are also well‑recognised. 
225. Thanks to the concerted efforts of all concerned, Hong Kong’s status as  an international financial centre has climbed up one place to restore the global third  position, putting an end to the negative narratives of our city’s future. We moved  up two places to rank fifth in world competitiveness, and rose seven places in talent  competitiveness, to stand among the world’s top 10 once again. Hong Kong also  retains the top spots in global ranking in investment environment, international  trade, business legislation and air‑cargo throughput, etc. 
226. That said, past performance is no guarantee of future success. We must  not be complacent, but keep up our momentum for advancement and reforms. We  must remain confident in ourselves and uphold our morale, standing firm against  any efforts to downplay our success story.
69 
227. This Policy Address deepens the reforms that I have introduced since  I became Chief Executive. It presents enhanced measures to boost the economy and  improve people’s livelihood. It seeks to address the prevailing needs of our people,  while mapping our vision and long‑term goals for building a brighter future for  Hong Kong. 
228. Amid the accelerating global changes not seen in a century and complex  geopolitics, the uncertainties surrounding the Sino‑United States relations have  exposed Hong Kong to frontline external political forces. But while we are facing  many challenges, they are outweighed by the opportunities available to us. Global  economic gravity continues to shift eastward and investment is also shifting the  same direction to balance geopolitical risks. Hong Kong boasts a secure and stable  investment environment, enjoys a favourable location at the heart of Asia, and is  the only city in the world where China’s advantages and international advantages  converge. Blessed with our linkage with our motherland and close connection  to the world, as well as the solid backing of our country including the Central  Government’s support and measures benefitting our city, Hong Kong stands to  prosper. We must seize every opportunity to make progress and renew ourselves.  Indeed, with the wisdom and experiences of Hong Kong people, coupled with the  dare‑to‑fight and win spirit in us, I am confident that Hong Kong will continue to  go from strength to strength and attain new heights. Through our united efforts to  reform and innovate, our economy will go even stronger and our people will lead a  better life, making Hong Kong a shining city.
70 
Annex: Indicators for Specified Tasks 
1. In the 2023 Policy Address, I set a total of 150 indicators for specified tasks, including  KPIs, of which 73 were new ones. This has helped foster the Government’s  result‑oriented culture and enable me to monitor work progress and outcome more  effectively. 
2. I have reviewed the implementation of these indicators, including “tasks completed”  (covering several tasks which are completed by now but with delay in the interim),  “tasks on track”, and even “tasks exceeding targets” (such as trawling for talents).  For the six indicators that have yet to be completed as scheduled, their positions are  as follows:
(i) 
Conclude the discussions and sign  a new arrangement for service of  judicial documents in civil and  commercial proceedings with  the Supreme People’s Court by  end‑2023.
This task involves discussions  with the Supreme People’s Court  on the detailed arrangements and  procedures. Although both sides  have generally reached a consensus,  the subject elements are more  complex than expected. The task is  anticipated to be completed by the  end of this year.
(ii) 
I n t r o d u c e t h e c o m p a n y  r e ‑ d o m i c i l i a t i o n r e g i m e t o  provide facilitation for companies  domiciled overseas to re‑domicile  to Hong Kong by submitting  legislative amendment proposals to  the LegCo in the first half of 2024.
The FSTB has completed the public  consultation on the proposals  and published the consultation  conclusions. Given the need to  clarify some legal issues and finalise  the details, a longer time is required  for law drafting. The bill is now  planned to be introduced into the  LegCo by the end of this year.
(iii) 
Commence the statutory procedures  for the EIA for the Kau Yi Chau  Artificial Islands by end‑2023.
I t h a s b e e n i n d i c a t e d i n t h e  2024‑25 Budget that the project  schedule would be adjusted on  consideration of fiscal control.  The plan now is to commence the  relevant process in end‑2024 and  complete the EIA in 2025.



71 
